So not sure if anyone has thought about this yet but With shorter quarters i am removing most full priced guns from my team. Under priced premo’s & mid pricers are the go now. Cant wait to sideways Jacobs > Grundy in 5 rounds time! You have to bat deep…. Good Luck Mate Mate if games are 20% shorter, it means players will probably score around 20% less meaning full priced players have bugger all chance of hitting BE’s. Underpriced premo’s & the right mid pricers should still rise in value. No way im paying 900k for a guy guaranteed to drop 150-200k in a months time. Also means they can stay on the ground longer and continue to rack up points… Go Read RDT email they have made changes to help combat that,,, Good Luck 1… Viney, zmerret and Greenwood 2. Cripps, Danger/Bont and westhoff? 3. Cripps, viney and dusty? 1 2 or 3. 1 just worried about cripps, plays around 90% game time each season to get his scores.. Where as merrett plays around 75% or somewhere around that and scores more. different looking season so hard to make choices right now haha 1. Grundy, Cerra, McAsey (Starc d7) or. Jacobs, Crisp, Cumming (McAsey d7) Merrett, Jacobs and Sturt (on field) or Adams, Naismith and Petrecca 2 but I’d go Hopper over Adams Cripps and dusty or zmerret and patracca? Feel free to join: CA3YD7WT Anyone know the codes of Dt Talk public leagues? 284512 RDT RDT league need filling 284512. Cheers lads, stay well! I’ve seen a few people saying they’re offloading full priced guns due to shorter quarters.. have shorter quarters been locked in or is this just speculation? Can easily just trade a full priced player once the shorter quarters come in for a Selwood/Ward like type when it comes to it but surely you still start with them now if you were always intending on doing so? If anything, I thought due to the shorter season you would want more of the Uber premiums since you have left time to upgrade to them Quarters are 16min in length with time on, so still likely to last 24-25mins total. Everyone’s saying that they’re trading premos due to shorter quarter. Their BE’s aren’t a specific number, it was discussed by Warnie on his Twitter than their BE is relative to points scored throughout the whole week. Thus, everyone should be scoring less due to shorter quarters meaning the drop isn’t as bad as first thought. I believe there will be a small drop but not 200k drop Let em trade their premos under their false belief. ENough info has come out about the BE calculations. But it has brough NicNat into my calculations as he only plays about 12minutes a quarter which probably won’t change much (from 60% game time to 75%) 1. Cripps and dusty or 2. zmerret and patracca? Cripps and Dusty by a mile for me because I think Cripps is more explosive then ZMerret and petracca could score 100 one week and score 60 the next he is not very consistent and normally does well in marsh series then spuds out when the season starts What’s the benefit of going #2…? Are you gaining money to upgrade somewhere else? If it means you get a Whitfield/Grundy type operator in your side then still probably no. #1 is Taylor Adams an option or is it to much risk with injury Which one is better 1 Tom green, dusty and starcevich 2 Dunkley/bont, Budarick and starcevich 3 crisp, Tom green and Budarick Am I crazy? DEF: Crisp, Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Madgen, (Gould, Williams) MID: Dunkley, Cogs, Cripps, Titch, McGrath, Rowell, Green, Pickett, (Sharp, Brown) RUCK: ROB, Jacobs, (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Petracca, Ceglar, Brayshaw, Brander, Taylor, (Cavarra, King) UTILITY: Budarick I don’t think it is too crazy! Considering you don’t have Grundy do you think it is nearly worth you going ROB to naismith to free up even more cash? Just food for thought Stoked there is footy tonight. Back in the Fantasy game after 2 years in the wilderness. Join my league: WM4ACNY9 Stephens/Noah Anderson + Cameron (R3) Or Sturt + Naismith (R3) 284512 RDT Leagues to fill…738516…794917….360371… BRING IT ON… Haydos… toss a coin between 1&2, similar scoring, potential higher ceiling. Anyone want to join a last minute league? code is 33PNAXDF 1. Greenwood, patracca and nic Nat Or 2. Dusty, deven Smith and naismith? 1 or 2 Hey guys, last minute thoughts on this team? DEF – Smith, Houston, Doc, Howe, Roberton, Gould (Greaves, Mclennan) MID – Macrae, Danger, Cogs, Titch, Viney, Rowell, Green, Pickett (Brown, Budarick) RUCK – Jacobs, Naismith (Cameron) FWD – Whitfield, Dusty, Smith, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Taylor (King, Sturt) UTL – 170k Appreciate any feedback thanks Quite similar to my team except I have Sauce, Cripps and Brander instead of Naismith, Viney and Smith. I like yours a bit better but I’m just too scared to go Naismith even though I do think he is going to perform well and generate cash. Main thing I’m trying to figure out right now is if I trust Greenwood enough to keep him in or should I go Petracca. Tough decisions! Looking for some final thoughts and advice going into R1. A lot of deliberating but I’ve decided to go with a more set and forget mid/ruck, with a forwardline and defence predominantly filled with (hopefully) cash-generating mid-pricers. DEF: BSmith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Ash, Gould (B Williams, T Watson) MID: Macrae, Danger, Coniglio, Cripps, Titch, Rowell, T Green, Pickett (Budarick, McHenry) RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Dusty, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Brander, Taylor (King, Rankine) UTL: Xerri Heard Rankine has had an injury setback aswell, any 170k forwards I could swap him out for? Cavarra? Ash and Gould are out. And Rankine. 1. Greenwood, patracca and nic Nat Or 2. Dusty, deven Smith and naismith? 1 or 2. Zac Langdon or Schultz? Pick 1 Sicily Haynes Greenwood Petracca? 1. Devon Smith and Viney 2. Petracca and Taylor Adams 3. Petracca and someone who is less then 773k but who? What option fellas 1. Whitfield and Jacobs 2. Petracca and Gawn Also 3. Anderson, Naismith (R3) and McGrath 4. McInerney (bench for Pickett), Cameron (R3) and Adams Absolutely love ya if you can help with this. will also help you in return if needed Afl Fantasy league code SYHNC67K Pick 1 Sicily Haynes Greenwood Petracca?. Pick 1 Schultz Zerk-thacher Patton Lukosius Lukosius Best combo 1. Nick Haynes, budirck and zmerret 2. Nick Haynes, Patton and viney 3. Nick Haynes, Schultz and Adams 4. Sicily, Schultz and viney 1 2 3 or 4 Arghhhh conflicted …. B.Smith and C> Petracca …. OR .. Sicily and MacPherson Hey Guys, would youse be able to help me find away to get Naismith at R3 whilst keeping the Grundy Gawn combo? Absolute legend if you can Remaining: 16k DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Ash, Starcevich (Watson, Greaves) MID: Dunk, Fyfe, Cogs, Cripps, Mitchell, Rowell, Stephens, Green (Pickett, Brown) RUC: Grundy, Gawn (Xerri) FED: Whit, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Schultz, Brander, Taylor (Rankine, King) UTL: Budarick Cheers guys Easy mate Crisp – Brodie Smith Trade Stephens to Jeremy sharp & put Pickett on the ground That should get it done Cheers for your help, Swallow in an interview didn’t seem confident in sharp debuting R1 however. With the schedule being crammed could get an early debut? Thank you. Looking good. Crisp to Smith Fyfe to any of Lyons, D.Smith, Worpel, Steele, Walsh or McCluggage Best combo 1. Josh kelly and Greenwood or 2. Devon smith and cripps 3. Devon smith and Adams? 1 2 or 3 2,1,3 is the order for me AFL Season cut to 17 games. Does AFL fantasy even go ahead? Prizes changed? What does it mean for byes? I think the traders have already abandon ship and left the rest of us to fend for ourselves. Draft leagues are shot to pieces. If the the commissioner can still alter settings…maybe ? The good from the bad is that at least the AFL is now fair..each team plays each other once. My team: DEF Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Cerra, Lukosius, Roberton (Starcevich, Williams) MID Macrae, Whitfield, Dangerfield, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (Robertson, Sharp) RUC Jacobs, Naismith (Cameron) FWD Steven, MacPherson, Brayshaw, Smith, Patton, Schultz (King, Rankine) UTL C.Taylor Best combo 1. Grundy and patracca or 2. Whitfield and Sam Jacobs? Controversial to popular thought, but I think #2 is better. Commissioners can alter settings in draft. I changed to…. play each other once/ byes on/ final four. This should work as I have small draft leagues. It took the tech. boffins almost 3 weeks to get my C and Vc buttons to work …so how are they going to cope with this ? Hey Guys, thought I’de wait to the last week to release my league. Anyone is welcome, the code is NJXCLKFD. Note to all beginner players, feel free to join but there may be some more experienced players in the league. Just a good option for anyone stuck without a league. Hope anyone that joins enjoys! Join this fantasy league W5VAARJM OK, which one, Greenwood or Cegler? I’m looking for a forward option that isn’t Macpherson, Steven, Smith, Brayshaw, haha. uhhhh greenwood > ceglar but also other options than the ones you listed include parish / ainsworth / hoskin-elliot & rozee. overall i’d recommend picking brayshaw / greenwood from the ones you’ve listed because they should leave you with some extra cash, all things considered. go with your gut. well new strat for me, was happy with my team, but being cut 5 rounds means midpricemadness for me. Sucks i haven’t had time to watch all the midpricers as i wasn’t sold on them beforehand RDT, this is the team I feel…. BACKS. Crisp, Smith, Docherty, Roberton, Ash, McAsey.(Watson, Gould.) MIDS. Macrae, Merrett, Coniglio, Mitchell,Yeo, Houston, Rowell, Green. (Pickett, Sharp, Budarick.) RUCKS. Grundy, Jacobs. (Conroy.) FWDS. Whitfield, Smith, Brayshaw, Steven, Brander, Georgiades. (Rankine, King.) $98,600 left over…. all thoughts appreciated… this team goes well over the cap? No it doesn’t, this RDT…. and it is a good team, except that Steven won’t be playing so I have traded him out for Greenwood… Hi Everyone The below AFL FANTASY league has just been created for players that have finished in the top 3000 in Supercoach or AFL Fantasy. League of Gentleman CODE: MDAK56WL I have finished top 1000 over the last couple years and am looking for players of similar playing ability and experience Does this get me a gig?….. ROUND 21 PRIZE WINNER Congratulation to Greg* from QLD, the Round 21 Weekly winner Greg’s team The Chosen Won had the highest score of 2583, Winning the weekly cash prize. *Prize winner subject to verifcation. Good Luck™®© See you in there ;) I’m also filling up the last few spots of a league: V2WZC9J6 Grundy and Hayden Young (if he plays) Or English and Haynes I want to captain Whitfield round 1 so is it worth paying up for Grundy not to captain him in R1? What would you guys pick here 1. Grundy and Patton 2. Jacobs and Whitfield 2. I am Menegola ©™ Good Luck™®© Have $37k left with a utility player to come. Any suggestions to delete/add to fit under salary cap? Thanks…. DEF : Docherty, Crisp, Laird, Roberton, Ash, H. Young ( Gould, Brander) MID : Macrae, Whitfield, Neale, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Dylan Stephens, Pickett (Tom Green, Deven Robertson) RUCK : Grundy, Jacobs (Darcy Cameron) FWD : Greene, Martin, Brayshaw, Townsend, Georgiades, Rankine ( King, Curtis Taylor) I like it but most sides would look good with an extra $133k in the kitty:-P To free up some cash maybe Greene or Dusty down to Viney (moving Whitfield forward) I also think Houston in must have in defence so Crisp or Laird down to him Thanks, Tinkerer. Good ideas. Get rid of Townsend. If he plays he will be sitting forward like he did in the Marsh games. Anyone want to join a league with competitive players? League Code: WFPK9S5R Callan Ward was hyped up leading up to Marsh, but is now nowhere to be seen. Any reason for that? Injured TEAM NAME: Guns, Value, Rooks Remaining: $6,000 Def: B.Smith, D.Houston, S.Docherty, D.Roberton, L.Ash, H.Young (B.Williams, T.Watson) Mid: J.Macrae, Z.Merrett, C.Oliver, S.Coniglio, T.Mitchel, M.Rowell, T.Green, M.Pickett (N.McHenry, T.Brown) Ruc: B.Grundy, S.Jacobs (T.Xerri) Fwd: L.Whitfield, J.Steven, H.Greenwood, A.Brayshaw, J.Brander, C.Taylor (I.Rankine, M.King) Utility: C.Budarick Pretty happy with this but thoughts appreciated. Inevitably I’ll probably need to turn Oliver > Viney (+$175k) and/or Grundy > Gawn (+$90k) to pay up for some better rooks Hey crew, it appears a lot of people are too preoccupied with stockpiling supplies rather than rejoin league from last year. So I have quite a few spots left – 9D74YJZN. Open for all! Dunk + Cameron (R3) vs Steele/Adams + Naismith (R3) Cheers xx Normally this time of year the rate my team page is so packed, this year its a ghost town.. where is everyone? Maybe people are realising this isnt the year to take things too serious, so much luck involved in this season coming up it might just be about having fun and not overthinking things Hey guys, I need some help with this… Option #1 Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs, Naismith + Zerk Thatcher (D6) + Noah Anderson (M7) + Patton (F4) + 170k (F5) Option #2 Ruck: Jacobs, Naismith, Cameron + 170k (will gould gets moved from bench to D6) + Marcus Bontempelli (M2) + Christian Petracca (F3) + Jacob Townsend (F5) Stuck in conflict between the 2. Option 1 has no rookies on field in defence but my forward seems a little bit weak but forward is the spot with the best rookies. Option 2 looks a lot better except for the loss of Grundy. What do you guys think??? Thanks in advance for anyone who helps! Best midpricer pick 1? Greenwood Wingard Petracca Westhoff Jack Martin Petracca, Greenwood are the best all others are irrelevant in my opinion Greenwood the best of a bad bunch C’mon already! Put me out of my misery – one way or another Danger/Cogs V Dunk/Cripps?? Thoughts on the team lads? DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Ash, Starcevich ( Williams, Watson) MID: Dunkley, Cogs, Cripps, Mitchell, Hopper, Rowelll, Pickett, Anderson. RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Steven, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Brander, Budarick ( King, Taylor) UTIL: Valente Anything I should look at changing? Steven, hes unlikely to be named got some spare spots in my AF and RDT league’s feel free to join 502324 rdt S7CYD7KP Fantasy AF FULL What do people think of this team? DEF: Smith, Sicily, Houston, Doch, Roberton, Gould, (Williams, Watson) MID: Dunkley, Cogs, Cripps, Titch, McGrath, Rowell, Green, Pickett, (Starcevich, Brown) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs, (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, MacPherson, Ceglar, Brayshaw, Brander, Taylor, (Rankine, King) UTILITY: Budarick will shultz play?? Hey guy! Had to drastically change tactics from guns and rooks to midprice mayhem due to 5 less rounds to finish my team Remaining: 28k DEF: Smith, Houston, Doc, Birch, Roberton, Brander (Starcevich, Watson) MID: Dunk, Cogs, Cripps, Titch, McGrath, Rowell, Stephens, Green (Pickett, Brown) RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) FWD: Whit, Greenwood, Tracca, Brayshaw, Bewley, Taylor (Rankine, King) UTL: Budarick Would love thoughts and help on my team as I haven’t had much time to think of midpricers and back myself in! Cheers guys Pick 1 Jack Martin Greenwood Petracca? Brayshaw Pick 1 Z merret Gaff Danger Cripps Cripps Order: Cripps, Merrett, Gaff, Danger Best combo 1. Adams, viney and dusty 2. Adams, zmerret and Greenwood 3. Viney, zmerret and Greenwood 4. Cripps, Danger/Bont and westhoff? 1 2 3 or 4 3/4 for me. I cant trust Adams’ body DEF: Houston, Ryan, Haynes, Doch, Cerra, Noble (Williams, Watson) MID: Mitchell, Brodie, Viney, Wingard, Mcgrath, Smith, Narkle, Hatley (Picket, Brown) RUC: Jacobs, Naismith (Cameron) FOR: Parish, Greenwood, SPP, Rozee, Brayshaw, Bewley (Rankine, King) UTL: Budarick decided to make a midpriced madness team, what do you blokes reckon ? Be good for a top 80-90k finish Thoughts? Pending teams this is likely what I’ll go into r1 with I reckon. 55k remaining DEF: Crisp, Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Brander (Williams, Watson) MID: Macrae, Dunkley, Coniglio, Mitchell, Hately, Rowell, Green, Pickett (PSharp, McHenry) RUC: Jacobs, Naismith (Xerri) FOR: Whitfield, D.Martin, Greenwood, Petracca, Brayshaw, Taylor (Rankine, King) UTL: Budarick What do we think of this team? Def – Crisp, Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Starcevich (Williams, Goddard) Mid – Macrae, Dunkley, Coniglio, T Mitchell, Viney, Rowell, Pickett (Anderson, Green) Ruck – Grundy, Naismith (D Cameron) Forward – Whitfield, Brayshaw, Schultz, Townsend, C Taylor, M King (Xerri, Rankine) UTL – Budarick Dunno whether I should choose: Grundy / N Anderson Or J Stevens / S Jacobs (ruck) Steven probably won’t play R1. Join my AFL Fantasy League DTTalk exclusive only. League Code: SAWCACTY 1. Viney, zmerret and Greenwood 2. Cripps, Danger/Bont and westhoff? 3. Cripps, viney and dusty? 1 2 or 3 Would love any opinions on this side: DEF: Smith, Weller, Houston, Doc, Noble, Roberton (Brander, Starcevich) MID: Macrae, Cogs, Mitchell, Viney, Hately, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (Sharp, Budarick) RUC: Jacobs, Naismith (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Smith, Steven, Ceglar, Brayshaw, Taylor (King, Rankine) Going against Grundy for value. If Ash is named R1 will downgrade Noble to him and upgrade elsewhere. Any feedback is welcome :) G’day mate, I would consider working patton ruc/fwd into your forward line so you can use the utility (pick a fwd rook) to swap him into the ruck in case Jacobs or Naismith miss a game somehow. Scratch that comment just noticed ceglar soz What do we think of this team? Honest thoughts on this pls… D – Houston, Crisp, Brander, Starcevich, Docherty, Roberton. Bench – Gould, Goddard M – Rowell, Titch, Cripps, Neale, Macrae, Dunkley, Cogs, M Pickett. Bench – McHenry, Bytel Ruck – Naitanui, Jacobs. Bench – D Cameron F – Steven, Brayshaw, Townsend, Whitfield, C Taylor, Patton. Bench – M King, Rankine. 15K left.. Let me know what ya think! Terrible in every way, hope that helps What do we think of this team? Honest thoughts on this pls… D – Houston, Crisp, Brander, Starcevich, Docherty, Roberton. Bench – Williams, Goddard M – Rowell, Titch, Cripps, Neale, Macrae, Dunkley, Cogs, M Pickett. Bench – McHenry, Bytel Ruck – Naitanui, Jacobs. Bench – D Cameron F – Steven, Brayshaw, Townsend, Whitfield, C Taylor, Patton. Bench – M King, Rankine. U – N Anderson Let me know what ya think Made two changes earlier, forgot about that soz! This is the full team I have now Try and repost your team in price order mate. It’s easier to read that way. Midf is super weak,4 rookies is way to much,2 or 3 max nice team, mate the rucks are a little bit risky. check out ” afl fantasy 69″ on youtube and subscribe to him, he has the best vids anyway love the team!! Hey guys, honestly stumped on what structure I should head into round 1 with. Here’s what I’ve got currently: DEF: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Young, Brander (Starcevich, 170k) MID: Dunkley, Oliver, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Green, Pickett (170k, 170k) RUC: Grundy, Gawn (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Walters, Macpherson, Brayshaw, Patton, Budarick (King, Taylor, Xerri) $$$: 34,000 I don’t mind the backline, and am fairly confident in the premiums I have picked, just as I said before, the actual structure of things isn’t something I’m set on. Also, rookies are doing my head in. Your not going to get 170k mid rookies so pay up boy First crisis “avoided” This is the Final List until teams Drop. DEF LaiRd DocH CeRRA WATTS RobeRtOn StaRcEvicH (brander watson) MID DUNKleY MCrouCh MitChelL HoPPeR WalsH HatELy RoWell PiCKett (mahoney budarick) RUCK GrunDy JacoBs (willaims) FWD WhitfieLd DusTY BrawsHaw ScHulTz LanDoN TaylOr (king cameron) Thrown Hately into the mix as i think he gets Taranto role. Also want to get Hanners in …..Maybe. Solid line up man Mids are looking a little on the weak side Yes on paper i agree. Hopper will put up good numbers and make cash as will walsh. HAtely could become green and upgrade hopper to a keeper.? Waiting Game Now. Love to hear your thoughts on my team DEF: BrSmith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, BZT, Ash (Williams, Watson) MID: Macrae, Gaff, Merrett, Mitchell, McGrath, Rowell, Green,Pickett (Robertson, North) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield,DSmith, Brayshaw,BaSmith, Townsend, Taylor (Davis, King) Utility: Starcevich Opinions on Hately & Steven or Viney & Rowbottom I’d back Hately and Steven over the other 2. So with the likely hood of the season being suspended as teams & players arent happy playing without crowds, what are we all going to do with our time… I hope it continues regardless but I do think any player who comes down with coronavirus should be a free trade I reckon all the clubs should embrace each other and sing viva forever – spice girls. Oh and another thing, I hope it causes a zombie outbreak Your a flog Hawk I am the Real Menegola ©™ Good Luck™®© Would love an opinion on the below: Def: Smith, Doch, Houston, Roberton, Ash, Gould (Starcevich, Watson) Mid: Macrae, Cogs, Cripps, Titch, Rowell, Pickett, Anderson, Green (Brown, Sharp) Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Walters, Macpherson, Steven, Brayshaw, Taylor (Davis, King, Budarick) What do we think of this team? Honest thoughts on this pls… I have already shown this team earlier, but I was told to do this in number order as it is easier to read. D – Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Brander, Starcevich. Bench – Williams, Goddard M – Macrae, Dunkley, Neale, Coniglio, Cripps, T Mitchell, Rowell, Pickett Bench – McHenry, Bytel Ruck – Jacobs, Naitanui Bench – D Cameron F – Whitfield, Steven, Brayshaw, Patton, Townsend, Taylor Bench – M King, Rankine. U – N Anderson Let me know ya think! Very expensive premiums in macrae, dunkley, neale. I personally like to find a little more value in atleast m2 and m3 where i think the player will increase about 10-15 points on their current average. This way you can set up more of a contingency plan as well as invest that money elsewhere. Must think the long game and there is a good chance macrae and dunks will lose value and you will get them cheaper throughout the year. def: smith, houston, clark, docherty, roberton, young mid: macrae, dunkley, gaff, cognilio, titch, rowell, mchenry, pickett ruck: grundy, jacobs fwd: whitfield, macpherson, brayshaw, jones, king, rankine utility starcevich $15k left any tips or improvement? would love opinions on my team DEF: Laird, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Young, Gould (Starcevich, B Williams) MID: Macrae, Neale, coniglio, Mitchell, Hannebery, Rowell, Serong, Pickett (T Brown, N McHenry) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs (D Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Petracca, Brayshaw, Jones, Georgiades (M King, I Rankine) U: Luke Valentine Defence is solid! ✅ Midfield: would be weary of Hannebery and Serong. Would be thinking about Anderson due to JS Ruck: Standard ✅ Forward: be weary of Jones and Georgiades. Would go more of a rookie With Jones and Use the extra $$ on Hannebery thanks mate appreciate it Wanted anyone’s opinion Option 1) M5 Hately M9 Green R2 Naismith Option 2) M5 Wingard M9 (170k Mid) R2 Naismith Option 3) M5 Viney M9 Green R2 (170k Ruc – Cameron or Xerri) 1 Sorry I meant Wanted anyone’s opinion Option 1) M5 Hately M9 Green R3 Naismith Option 2) M5 Wingard M9 (170k Mid) R3 Naismith Option 3) M5 Viney M9 Green R3 (170k Ruc – Cameron or Xerri) You may as well all stop posting your teams as I have the winning team already Dammit Euman, i was about to post my team but now ive just gone & deleted it & removed my entry for 2020. Congratulations bud ??? Thanks mate Happy Final Week of Preseason folks. Created a league for anyone who’s keen to join: V2WZC9J6 Extra points if you have a team name inspired by a mediocre 90s footballer. This year I’ve gone with “Dance Monkhorsts”. Damian Monkhorst was mediocre? 1990 still hurts yeah bruh? Haha no he was a beast… I should have said classic 90s players. is Lukosius the real deal? priced at almost 10 points less than cerra, is he a better alternative?? real concern is he becomes more of a lock down type when the suns come up against some better opposition. Brah!! There whole back 6 have that lockdown type of game play, cause they are a crap team. To be honest I have him in my team DPP brah. Solid finish to last year, solid marsh series, 2 wins brah. Will swing forward and back and play a Lloyd type roll brah. Draft question, who would you rather take with pick, J.Kelly or Gawn? No doubt Gawn OK guys, need your thoughts on this team… RDT. BACKS. Crisp, Smith, Docherty, Houston, Roberton, McAsey. (Gould, Williams.) MIDS. Macrae, Merrett, Coniglio, Mitchell, Yeo, Rowell, Anderson, Green.(Pickett, Sharp, Budarick.) RUCKS. Grundy, Jacobs. (Convoy.) FWDS. Whitfield, Greenwood, Smith, Brayshaw, Brander, Taylor.(Georgiades, King.) have only $4,500 left in the Bank, but think I have a even spread of players…. Looking to fill up a league (Code W6XWY6ER) Suitable for new or intermediate standard Would appreciate any comments on my team Running with 7 rookies (5 on field) in the mids. DEF: Laird, Houston, Docherty, Lukosius, Roberton, I Cumming (Gould, Watson) MID: Macrae, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Tom Green, Sharp, Pickett (Stephens, Robertson) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, D Smith, D Martin, Brayshaw, Townsend, Taylor (M King, I Rankine) U: Buderick $286k left over Honestly, it doesn’t feel like your team is that much better everywhere else considering the hit you’ve taken in the midfield, apart from the extra forward premium Not entirely happy but it’s close to what I was looking for. Thoughts : DEF: B Smith, Haynes, Docherty, Lukosius, Roberton, B Zerk-Thatcher (Gould, Watson) MID: Bontempelli, Yeo, Cripps, Mitchell, Viney, Rowell, Ash, Pickett (Sharp, T Brown) RUCK: Jacobs, English (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, D Smith, D Martin, And Brayshaw, Brander, Taylor (M King, Budarick) U: Starcevich $32 left over Damo stop fretting. The season wont get completed. It wont even make week 4. Relax. Spend time with family, have a beer before pubs close. I have put together a draft for tonight 9pm. 10 Teams (3,4,1,3/4 format) league code N6UXKEHA Feel free to join. Dont bother. Season will not get completed. I’m with you on this One. Sources in Europe have shown the unaffected being eaten by the affected. Imagine the first game being played on Thursday night and only half disembark the G after it. That would actually be interesting.. New Keeper League (6, 8, 1, 6) on Ultimate Footy. Four spots left, all welcome. https://www.ultimatefooty.com.au/158602/ See most sides are rolling with Macrae at M1..Thoughts on Bont as M1? Nah.. Anyone else having trouble joining fantasy league teams, put in code and all you get is, sorry bla bla bla. I think it’s becuase of the coronavirus bud! Remember government officials have banned gatherings and groups, which means they don’t want multiple people in the same area. Mabye you should read the news a bit Damo.. suggestions lukosius to Ash similar scoring more $ to gain, English to Jacobs similar scoring although Jacobs maybe a bit better & more $, Anderson for mid. More $ in war chest. Thanks Cambpell for your advise, I don’t read the news Much becuase mabye I’m a bit dyslexic or not very smrat. Living in a bubble and talking about the same 40 players for 5 months. How many of you have won anything doing that? Best forward under 311K??? Townsend,Taylor, Schultz if under Brayshaw or Petracca? Brayshaw. Slightly cheaper and has a good ceiling. Petracca has same ceiling but aside from Marsh1 hasn’t translated this into his game consistently yet. Both are great picks though. Thanks Bomber Basically locked into going with this side round 1 Def: B Smith, Houston, Doch, Roberton, Ash, H Young (Gould, Williams) Mid: Dunkley, Coniglio, Mitchell, Viney, McGrath, Rowell, Green, Pickett (N Anderson, T Brown) Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) Fwd: Whitfield, Steven, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Schultz, Taylor (Budarick, Brander) Utl: Sharp I think it’s worth paying up for rookies on the bench like Anderson and Gould this year with limited $170s around. Also considering going Schultz and Greenwood to Lukosius and Bailey Smith but the rest is pretty much locked. Thoughts? Be careful having the 2 mid pricers (Viney and McGrath) in the midfield. Going to be difficult to upgrade both of them And the 3 rookies in field to Uber Premiums by seasons end. You are essentially banking on 1-2 of those to stay the whole season for you. To be honest I am actually thinking the same way. But it would take a Gusty person to play that way. 18 team league available for those equivalent to weekend golfers………..know how to pay but aren’t very good at it, hehe K9SRN7YA The Schultz hype real? Not really, he got 4 goals in M1 and 2 in M2 that pushed up his score. He’s going to have some spud scores when he doesn’t get on the scoresheet. Hannebery or Petracca? Evening Lads! DEF: Crisp, Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Ash (Gould, Brander) MID: Macrae, Cogs, Cripps, Mitchell, Viney, Rowell, Green, Pickett (Starcevich, McHenry) RUCK: Jacobs, Naismith (Williams) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Petracca, Ceglar, Brayshaw, Taylor (Rankine, King) Cash: $15k Thoughts on this side? Or do I go Smith down to McLennan and field Brander in defence and Ceglar to Steven to get Jacobs to Grundy? Thoughts appreciated Mate i think you probably need grundy. I would downgrade one of those defenders One classic league spot left 3C53S2SD Get ON! full Pick one: Hopper, McCluggage, Ross Ross Thoughts on my side? Schultz or Bewley?? Thanks in advance Def: Smith, Houston, Doch, Roberton, Ash, Brander (Gould, Watson) Mid: Macrae, Dunk, Danger, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Green, Pickett (Anderson, Budarick) Ruc: Grundy, Naismith (Xerri) Fwd: Whitfield, Steven, Ceglar, Brayshaw, Schultz, Taylor (Rankine, King) Utility: Davis Bewley for me mate My leagues for senior citizens still need some coaches: Old Fogies’ Fantasy 4RSWS9VK) needs one more team and RDT Old Fogies (974705) needs six more teams. At this late date the leagues are open to all comers despite the disadvantage younger players may have…..Good luck. Merrett or brouch or Dunkley ??M2 Dunkley What does Ash’s and Green’s Job Security look like guys?? I’m interested also. not good I would like to think short term until Taranto and Z Williams return. Short term ahaha taranto is out for 4 months and williams has no return date so not long term i would think for green atleast Backs- smith, Houston, doc, Roberton, zerk, Gould Bench Brander, Watson Mids- Macrae, Dunkley, cogs, tich, green, Pickett, Rowell, Anderson Bench Robertson,starcevich Rucks- Grundy, jacobs Xerri Fwd- Whitfield, Martin, Smith, Brayshaw, bewely, Taylor Bench Rankie, king Ult- budarick 12k left Too expensive in the fwd line one of the better teams ive seen. not sure gould will play tho Backs – Smith, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Ash, Mcasey (Brander, Starcevich) Mids – Bont, Coniglio, Cripps, Titch, Viney, Rowell, Green, Pickett (Budarick, Sharp) Rucks – Grundy, Jacobs (Williams) Forwards – Whitfield, Steven, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Patton, Taylor (King, Rankine) Got about 40k left. May upgrade viney depending on what rookies get named. Any thoughts? Don’t mind this side, although not keen on Patton. Keep an eye on Ash also, might not be there round 1. If Green isn’t named round 1 go Anderson mate. Good team, but I’m going with no Grundy. Reckon he’ll drop in price and be a better bargain later in the season. Played this tactic last year and it worked well for me. I’m having trouble finding the league codes for my leagues, any idea where to find them? Cheers. Here’s some leagues for those interested. SuperCoach DT Talk 2020: 487571 Sportsdeck Dream Team DT Talk 20: 861045 DT Talk Carlton 20: 794760 AFL Fantasy DT Talk Carlton 2020: Can’t find the league code anywhere on the site or app. SuperCoach DT Talk Carlton: 655341 Crisp, B. Smith, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Brander (Greaves, McLennan) Yeo, Oliver, Cogs, Cripps, Titch, Pickett, Rowell, Green (Robertson, Sharp) Jacobs, Naismith (Cameron) Whits, D. Smith, MacP, Brayshaw, Ranking, Taylor (Davis, King) U: Buderick 161K left Go your hardest, need the help! First time I’ve asked for it. Happy to comment on others. great team, love it, if it was me i would spend up in the mids to get to a macare, kelly, dunks. other then that i would either go brander to cumming or davis to like a patton. but thats up to u Not bad at all. Probably won’t get many massive captain scores but some solid 100 players there to do the job. Smith, Doc, Houston, Roberton, Young, Brander (Gould, Bianco) Neale, Mitchell, Coniglio, Cripps, Bonts, Rowell, Green, Deven Robertson (Serong, Pickett) O’Brien, Jacobs (Naismith) Steven, Wingard, A. Brayshaw, Rozee, Shultz, Poholke (Rankine, King) U – Anderson Thoughts? FWDs are a gamble. Stevens could go either way. A few mid-pricers hoping for breakout. Poholke is expensive. Do you have $ to correct after Rd1 if it comes unstuck? D: smith Houston Doch Roberton brander Watson (greaves Williams) M: MacRae dunks cogs mcclugage titch Rowell Roberton Pickett (RCD McInerney) R: Grundy Sauce (Cameron) F: Whitfield Steven petracca Brayshaw Bewley Taylor (King budarick) U: Naismith See comment about Grundy above. I don’t trust Petracca. Those can easily be fixed and give you plenty of $ to spend or save. Starting rankine and Taylor on field will hurt your score Lack of Captain options I’d love some feedback on my side! DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Mcasey, Gould (Brander, Watson) MID: Macrae, Danger, Nigs, Titch, Brayshaw, Rowell, Green, Pickett (Anderson, Starcevich) RUCK: Grundy, Naismith (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Dusty, Smith, Petracca, Townsend, Taylor (King, Budarick) UTIL: Rankine Cheers See comment about Grundy above. I don’t trust Petracca. Risky to have a non-DPP as utility. Those can easily be fixed and give you plenty of $ to spend or save. Grundy will be fine and if you don’t start with him you’ll likely never have him even if his price drop a fair bit Why’s that? I didn’t start with him last year and ended up with him, paying a fair bit less. If that’s your only worry, then there’s no worries. Young or Ash and Stephens or Green or Serong Cheers guys x What and see who cops a gig Ballsy ruck choices otherwise, good luck… DEF: Weller, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Ash, Brander MID: Bont, COGS, Zorko, Mitchell, Brodie, Rowell, Anderson, Picket RUC: Grundy, Jacobs FWD: Whito, Steven, Tracca, Andy Bradyshaw, Taylor and a rookie I chosen Weller as i was looking more for role and he is playing in the guts any advice would be good Does anyone have a link to how the utility player works its not hard chief. utility means you can pick a player from any position in that spot. If you chose a forward and you emergency them, itll only be to cover the forward line. if you pick a mid/fwd (eg Budarick) then you decide whether you want him to cover midfield or forward emergency (it gives you the option what one). a forward utility cannot cover a 0 in defence. its purely means you can pick a player from any position instead of last year having two ruckmen. thanks lochie split between lukocious, bewley and schultz. lukocious could rack up marks off half back and then swing forward to kick a couple, but bewleys role looks good, especially with acres out and blakely out of the team. and schultz is the cheapest and looked the good in Marsh. which one for F5? Bewley Feel free to critique, nothing really going to change my mind other than round 1 rookie selection, just giving everyone a sneak peak at the starting lineup of this years winning coach. Cheers legends. DEF: Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Ash, McAsey (Watson, Williams) MID: Gaff, Merrett, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Green, Pickett (Robertson, Sharp) RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, Martin, McPherson, Brayshaw, Townsend, Taylor (King, Rankine) UTIL: Brander DEF: Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Birchall, Roberton, Madgen MID: Macrae, Gaff, Merrett, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Green, Pickett RUC: Jacobs, Nic Nat FWD: Dusty, Smith, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Long, Taylor bench whoever actually plays.. Bont, Naismith and Davis or Tom green, Jacobs and tucker Would love to hear your thoughts!! DEF: Smith, Houston, Doch, Roberton, Zerk, Ash (Brander, Starcevich) MID: Dunkley, Coniglio, Adams, Titch, Hately, Rowell, Green, Pickett (McHenry, Budarick) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Steven, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Rowbottom, Schultz (Rankine, King) (B.Davis) Thanks guys!! LOL Good Luck™®© Bont Naismith Davis Thoughts of Jon ceglar this year, handy forward option with the number one ruck mantle at the hawks , could push 90+ and has improved each year. Great pick, imo should go 95. What are people thinking Dev Smith can do this season? 95-100. Cheers Andy DEF-Crisp, Docherty, Roberton, Young, Gould,Brander MID-Coniglio, Neale, Bontempelli, Cripps, Mitchell, Walsh, Rowell, Pickett RUC-Grundy, Jacobs FWD-Whitfield, Martin, Greenwood, Brayshaw, King, Rankine BENCH-170k Rooks This team will fail if you are banking on 8 x 170k rookies! Good Luck in 2021™®© Bench players are literally just there to make money so spending money on players that can add absolutely no points to your team doesn’t make sense but alright. DEF- Crisp, B Smith, Houston, Doc, Ash, Roberton (Goddard, Greaves) MID- Merrett, Neale, Cogs, Titch, Narkle, Rowell, Green, Pickett (Cahill, Bytel) RUCK- Jacobs, Naismith (xerri) FWD- D. Smith, Steven, D Mac, Rozee, A. Bradshaw, Bewley (Rankine, King) UTL- C. Taylor Bank- $69 All thoughts are appreciated, thanks guys! I think Narkle is a cool POD but he is unproven yet beyond his small handfull of games last year. That is a big risk for such prime real estate, i hope it pays off for you. Cheers mate! Just created some new leagues, nothing serious, just some casual fun. DT Talk 2020 1: DLNE5K4E DT Talk 2020 2: H45P73HU Best sub 730k players in all positions? Assistant Coach Subscription… Good Luck™®© BSmith Houston Doc Roberton Ash Gould ( Brander Starcevich ) Danger Bont Cogs Cripps Mitchell Viney Rowell Green ( Pickett Anderson ) Sauce Naismith ( Cameron ) Green Smith Stevens Brayshaw Townsend Budarick ( Georgiades King ) Xerri 40k bank Not sold on Brodie Smith or Viney, Massive gamble with no Grundy lets hope he doesn’t start with a 140! Finally someone else who’s not filling bench spots with 170k rookies who wont play! Good Luck™®© Updated team Out Viney Smith In Neale Greenwood Should I have Whitfield and Patton or MacPherson and hof/Wingard in my foward line Sicily, Houston Docherty, birch, Roberton, ash Danger, cogs, Stevan, titch, B hill, Rowell, green, picket Gawn, Jacobs MacPherson, Greenwood, hof, petraca, brashaw, C Taylor I got Naismith on my bench. Would appreciate some feedback. I’ve posted in the past 4 my teams and haven’t got feedback so would appreciate some now. Like old mate above if you are banking on 170k rookies to fill your bench spots then your team will not generate enough cash to build a full squad.. Good Luck™®© My only 170k guys are king and Rankine and I’m confident they will play. What are your thoughts on the rest of my team Doubt Rankine will play who should i get smith or crisp Tossing up starting this team depending on rookies named – What do people think? DEF: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, McAsey, Brander, (Williams, McLennan) MID: Dunkley, Zerrett, Danger, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Green, Pickett, (Brown, Valente) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs, (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Ceglar, Brayshaw, Townsend, Taylor, (Rankine, King) UTILITY: (Budarick) The only players I don’t like are McAsey and Townsend. I think come next Thursday you will go into panic mode because half your rookie are not named and to generate enough cash to have decent bench you have to rebuild your team! Good Luck™®© Dont waste another second on your team. The season is over. Tomorrow the English premier league will get postponed (and eventually cancelled). Seria A, the NBA, NHL, MLB all postponed. The second an AFL player tests positive for Corona virus, season over. Stop fretting. Y A W N Go to school kid Good Luck in 2021™®© Best combo 1. Grundy and Patton Or 2. Dev Smith and Jacobs? I like number 2 – will be hard to get Grundy in later though Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Cumming, Brander (Gould, Starviech) Macare, Gaff, Crouch, Cogs, Titch, Pickett, Rowell, Green (170k, Sharp) Jacobs, Naismith (Cameron) Whits, D. Smith, Dusty, Brayshaw, Patton, Taylor (Davis, King) U: Buderick 30K left who is the better option Macare or Kelly Jarrod Berry anyone ?? Got 3 spots to fill in an intermediate/expert RDT league Code 202441 Jump in! Has anyone thought of Tomlinson? risky but could work? DEF: Crisp, Smith, Lloyd, May, Houston, Hibberd (Brander, McCasey) MID: Kelly, Titch, Setterfield, Bont, Picket, Serong, Boak, Green (Rowell, Sharp) RUCK: Naismith, Jacobs (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Hoff, Brayshaw, Rankine, King, Taylor (Davis, Budarick) U: McHenry Hahah gotta be one of the worst, back to the drawing board son lol made my day Gee thats a different team, Not sure about setters,boak,may, (no grundy or gawn), hoff, wouldnt be putting king on the ground and your also wasting rowell on the bench needs to have those mid pricers downgraded to rooks and use the cash better Inside info on setterfield at Carlton, Boak and Hoff will start the year very well yes rowell will be on the field. I hate Vanilla teams so this is my compromise dont care if it sux lol I honestly think besides the confirmation of rookies for R1 my team is pretty much set. Would love your opinions though. DEF: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, McFasey, Cumming (Williams, Greaves) MID: Macrae, Coniglio, Merrett, Bontempelli, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Green (Pickett, Sharp) RUCK: Goldstein, Jacobs (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, MacPherson, Brayshaw, Lukosius, Schultz, Brander (King, Taylor) UT: Starcevich Previous years I’ve gone for the highest players as possible for scoring thought I’d switch it up and go for premiums and money-makers hence why the rookies are so expensive (Naismith particularly). I know Grundy is not in there but I just can’t justify bringing in a 900K player when there are so many bargains and not many 170K rookies. Goldstein is low in my opinion so hopefully he gets back to his best. Careful with Goldy, he’s 31 now. and I don’t see him getting close to his 113 best. Don’t know if there’s enough upside there. I’d almost say take another 80k or so and move him to English, or even a little further to Ceglar. Love the Lukosius pick. I’m gonna go spare when the season start gets cancelled. Funny tho how this whole virus thing (for Formula1) was accurately predicted by “Asterix and the Chariot Race” – where the Italian lead racer was named “Coronavirus” … spooky wooooo. I’ve not touched my team for 2 weeks, since Marshpotato #1. I’m not going to touch it again until teams get named that are actually going to play – particularly if the season gets delayed and those players with injuries get a couple more weeks rest to get right – that will really require some thinking for RDT and SuperCoach with limited trades. … I’m waiting for the meme “The season’s gonna be delayed?!?!” “Free Kick Hawthorn!!” Jack Crisp or Brodie Smith? Crispy for the ceiling.i need to find 50k at the moment and I was wondering the same thing. Hi would welcome comments. Taking a risk with Ruck but extra premo in Mid Def: J.Crisp (97.74), D.Houston (80.35), S.Docherty (75.90), D.Roberton (44.08), H.Young (34.78), T.Watson (22.92) (M.Keane (22.92), B.Williams (22.92)) Mid: J.Macrae (115.66), M.Bontempelli (104.75), L.Neale (104.75), S.Coniglio (103.67), T.Mitchell (90.46), A.Brayshaw (69.56), C.Serong (34.51), M.Pickett (22.92) (T.Green (33.97), T.Brown (22.92)) Ruc: B.Grundy (122.14), S.Naismith (38.29) (T.Xerri (22.92)) Fwd: L.Whitfield (113.78), D.Smith (97.06), H.Greenwood (78.32), J.Patton (49.34), M.Georgiades (31.81), B.Davis (22.92) (C.Taylor (22.92), M.King (22.92)) (Cameron) Brodie Is 4 rookies in the middle too many ya think?? No mate :) Is Darcy tucker a good pod Got 93 from 82 minutes against west coast his score also caught my eye. attended more centre bounces than cerra, walters and even fyfe. with acres set to miss a 6-8 weeks, that opens up another midfield spot. looking like he is in freos midfield plans this year, but his relevancy will depend on how he can capitalise on those opportunities. has never really shown much fantasy potential, with only a high of 111 last year. interesting, but better options imo (brayshaw). if you have the balls to take the punt, i commend you. I honestly think besides the confirmation of rookies for R1 my team is pretty much set. Would love your opinions though. DEF: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, McFasey, Cumming (Williams, Greaves) MID: Macrae, Coniglio, Merrett, Bontempelli, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Green (Pickett, Sharp) RUCK: Goldstein, Jacobs (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, MacPherson, Brayshaw, Patton, Schultz, Brander (King, Taylor) UT: Starcevich Previous years I’ve gone for the highest players as possible for scoring thought I’d switch it up and go for premiums and money-makers hence why the rookies are so expensive (Naismith particularly). I know Grundy is not in there but I just can’t justify bringing in a 900K player when there are so many bargains and not many 170K rookies. Goldstein is low in my opinion so hopefully he gets back to his best. Any GWS fans out there have much info on Zac Langdon ?? Looks ripped and fit and finished a 1st & 2nd in their time trials and has had two good marsh games, I think he is much better position then shultz awkwardly priced for a rookie.. has stiff competition with Daniels (played 22 games last yr) and Hill (and GWS is stacked with mids who rotates as fwd) .. could affect his JS or output. If he plays FP – not a fantasy friendly role. Expect scores below 50 on some weeks. His score of 62 on Marsh 2 is par and could avg about the same. He’s a No for me. Trying for something a little different this year and going for more players who are bouncing back from down/injury years, or expecting a breakout, mostly because there aint that many decent rookies to field, definitely not across DEF or FWD with any confidence.. DEF: Smith, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Cumming, Gould (Williams, Watson) MID: Bont, Neale, Coniglio, Mitchell, Viney, Rowell, Green, Pickett (McInerney, Roberston) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) FWD: Martin/Smith, Steven, MacPherson, Brayshaw, Ainsworth, King (Rankine, Taylor) UT: Xerri Same with everyone else, the bench spots are all up for grabs, but taking a punt on a couple POD players like Cumming, Viney, Steven and Ainsworth based on their Marsh series form.. Martin & Smith is probably going to lean towards Dusty as he’s more likely to play all 22.. I like Viney, but past history I can’t bring myself to pick him. I’d definitely pick Martin, as Smith will play a lot of forward time when Heppell comes back and when Martin plays forward he kicks more goals. Steven only played one game in Marsh series so I won’t pick him R1. I hear you about Viney, but as a big fan of his outside of DT, his tackling looks to be back to his best and as long as he can contain his free kicks against, with those 2 things (which looked good in the marsh series), I see him adding 16 points per game alone.. Steven, yeah, not sure, I can see him cracking 100, but he could be changed to Walters possibly.. DEF: B Smith, Doch, Houston, Roberton, Ash, Young (Gould, Watson) MID: Macrae, Cog, Dunks, Mitchell, Rowell, Pickett, Green, Anderson (Sharp, Roberston) RCK: Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, Walters, D Smith, Brayshaw, Taylor, Brander (Davis, King) UTLY: Buderick What do we think? Obviously there’s a few rooks that you need to keep an eye on over the next 8 days. Can’t imagine them all playing. I’ve gone with Dunks in the Mid but thinking Merrett (50/50 on it) Another option I’m thinking is going Naismith to R2 then having the cash to go Brander to Steven. Thoughts? Cheers Rank these forward midpricers Parish Windgard Greenwood Petracca A.Brayshaw Anyone else should be added to the list? Shags, there’s probably only 10-15 points between them all as far as averages, so it’s tough… Greenwood – Probably the best tackler (90+) Brayshaw – Looked good in the marsh series as a full time mid (85+) Wingard – Full time mid (95+) 50/50 mid (80+) Parish – Will have 100+ games, but also 60s I think, hard to define his exact role week to week (85+) Petracca – All things equal, probably the best of the 5, but again, hard to define his exact role week to week (90+) I’m sure I’ll get slaughtered for my thoughts, but I’m only rocking with the kid from Freo in my team.. Brodie Smith or Shannon Hurn???? Brodie Smith way more explosive of the half back flank I agree jacko since Gibbs has moved to half back, Smith has increased his midfield minutes to give the engine room more pace too. So go smith Michael. Darcey Macpherson or Jack Steven? Darcy MAC!!, help above pls? Darcy .. Steven played good but squad ddnt have Jelwood and Duncan. So will pass on Steven for now til those two come back Steven Thoughts on Howe instead of Houston? NO, never…… Thoughts lads, cheers 10k left Bsmith, doch, Houston, Roberton, ash, young (gould, rivers) Macrae, dunks, yeo, cogs, titch, viney, rowell, Pickett (Anderson, green) Jacobs, naismith (williams) Whitfield, steven, Westhoff, Brayshaw, Taylor, king (rankine, budarik) Uti sharp Jack Steven and Brodie Smith Or Crisp and greenwood What do we reckon fellas? 1st option Greenwood you would think has more opportunity than steven so choice #2 Gresham vs Steven vs Petracca ?? Which one fellas long shot but any drafts happening tonight that need someone to fill a spot? MacPherson or J.Steven…also does anyone rate Rozee? I like Rozee but he has the R11 bye. Might upgrade to him after R11 if he is going well. Would you go Darcy Mac over Dusty? (Save 70k). Don’t know much about Darcy. Is he playing permanent mid or is he too risky? I have… Good Bye Round… Has increased every year… 52 71 87 ?????? Good Luck™®© I am Ready! Good Luck™®© I’m leaning towards Dusty over D Mac atm One thing i have learnt over many years is back your own judgement, Have a plan and stick to it despite what others do… Good Luck™®© best 726k players any postion Crisp / Doch / Titch / McCluggage / ROB / Dusty / Walters – take your pick e.g. Crisp vs D.Smith Gresham vs Steven vs Petracca ?? Which one fellas Steven 100% Ben Ainsworth is someone i haven’t heard anyone talk of and had 2 really good Marsh games, is he a trap or what are peoples thoughts on him? Ainsworth was rated highly as a youngster (4th Pick). Has been plagued by injury’s over the past few years.This could be his breakout year if his body is right. Priced at 483k i think it is too much unless you see him averaging anywhere in the 80s this season. Additionally, I would take GC scores with a grain of salt as they played a heavily depleted cats side and the new look young crows. gold coasts midfield is surprisingly deep and ainsworth isn’t really in the equation (didn’t attend any centre bounces against adelaide). will play mostly high half forward i assume, which limits his scoring a bit. should average around 80 imo. Feedback appreciated: DEF: Crisp, B Smith, Houston, Doch, Roberton, Brander (Ling, McLennan) MID: Dramafield, Bont, Titch, MacPherson, Narkle, Rowell, Robertson, Pickett (Valente, McHenry) RCK: Grundy, ROB (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, Dusty, Brayshaw, Poholke, Taylor, Rankine (Cavarra, King) UTLY: Starcevich Rooks will be rearranged according to who is selected in round 1. Quite a few of your under 250k wont play or have poor JS which means you may need a major reshuffle.. Good Luck™®© agree with chosen one, i count 8. id recommend trying to get some money in your kitty so you are prepared to upgrade to blokes who are named round 1. Finally 30 blokes looking at me when i am talking! Good Luck™®© DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Cerra, Roberton, Brander (170k,170k) MID: Macrae, Cogs, Cripps, Steele, Titch, Rowell, Green, Pickett (170k,170k) RUC: Grundy, Naismith (170k) FWD: Smith, Steven, Macpherson, Brayshaw, Long, Taylor (170k,170k) 17k left Because you have all 170k’s on the bench you need to have more money left over to cover the rooks. Personally I would drop Steele for Parish or Hanners and bank the money… Thoughts on my current set up would be appreciated. Rooks will change dependent on Round 1 teams. $87k remaining DEF: Houston, Haynes, Docherty, Roberton, Young, Starcevich (Mcasey, Gould) MID: Macrae, Dangerfield, Coniglio, Mitchell, Viney, Rowell, Robertson, Pickett (Green, Sharp) RUC: Gawn, Jacobs (Naismith) FWD: Smith, MacPherson, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Brander, Taylor (King, Rankine) UTL: (Budarick) Tossing up starting this team depending on rookies named – What do people think? DEF: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, McAsey, Brander, (Williams, McLennan) MID: Dunkley, Zerrett, Danger, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Green, Pickett, (Brown, Valente) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs, (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Ceglar, Brayshaw, Townsend, Taylor, (Rankine, King) UTILITY: (Budarick) The only players I don’t like are McAsey and Townsend. Pick one out of Dawson, Steven or Greenwood, cannot make up my mind…. I’m going Steven at this point of time Michael , he has been a proven fantasy gun before, he’s a bull if a midfielder and a gem to have as a FWD and I’m sure he can get back to his best. Seems happy playing footy right now. With greenwood I feel against undermanned sides he had performed well. They do have a lot of midfielders and not sure how there team will be suited and their rotations. Dawson was subdued a bit on the weekend with Lloyd back too so for me I’ve chosen Steven but that’s my opinion. Tucker or Cerra What does Ash’s and Green’s Job Security look like guys? Would love an opinion on the below: Def: Smith, Doch, Houston, Roberton, Ash, Gould (Starcevich, Watson) Mid: Macrae, Cogs, Cripps, Titch, Rowell, Pickett, Anderson, Green (Brown, Sharp) Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Walters, Macpherson, Steven, Brayshaw, Taylor (Davis, King, Budarick) Up for debate, Devon Smith or Lachie Whitfield? Thoughts on having an extra 144k to work with? It all depends on exactly what you do with that extra $144k With the rookie pool as bright as Hawk’s IQ The Question should be how long will it take you to make 144k to get him in??? Good Luck™®© Current team as it stands: Fantasy- Def: Crisp, Docherty, Houston, Roberton, Brander, Madgen, (Williams, Watson) Mid: Bontempelli, Coniglio, Yeo, Mitchell, Rowell, Green, Sharp, Pickett (McInerny, buderick) Ruck: Grundy, Sauce, (Naismith) Fwd: Whitfield, MacPherson, Brayshaw, Bailey Smith, Bewley, Crocker, (King, Taylor) Uti: Xerri 330k banked currently, Plan was to downgrade Whitfield, and therefore upgrade 2 of Bailey Smith, sharp or Madgen to underpriced premiums. Hahaha Chosen that made my day lol Still got spots in my DT Talk leagues ;) AF: XS2ZKUMC RDT: 456907 I’m in! Just joined, looking forward to it I’m in, won it last year so would be rude not to enter again Looking to fill up my Fantasy classic league, League of Ordinary Gentleman. Everyone welcome! League code: 7L346YW4 Cheers Just joined cheers Joining because I like the league name ;) Rank this list Bont Zmerret Danger Cripps Neale B crouch Yeo. Zerrett Bont Crouch Neale Cripps Yeo Danger Neale Zerret Bouch Cripps Bont Yeo Danger Bont Zmerret Cripps Danger B Crouch Yeo Neale Got some more spots to fill in my RDT league League code: 202441 Get involved! Anyone considering starting either Seb Ross or Jack Steele in their midfield? I think the bont will average more than mccrae and Dunkley this year just have a feeling he will hit 110 Seb Ross was my M4, but he underwhelmed through the Marsh series.. Steele looked good, but there’s more value in someone like McGluggage, Brayshaw, or even fellow Saint, Brad Hill.. Any drafts out there that still have spots? Would love some advice on my team. Def: Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Young, Gould, (Goddard, Starcevich) Mid: Macrae, Dunkley, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Serong, McHenry (Pickett, Budarick) Ruck: Grundy, ROB (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Wingard, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Townsend, Georgiades (King, Rankine) Uti: Xerri Defense: normal, looks fine Mid: too many rooks I reckon, I like the premos though Ruc: fine Fwd: I don’t like Townsend or Georgiades Final: Maybe downgrade ROB to Jacobs and use cash to upgrade a rookie Defence Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, cumming, zero-thatcher (Gould, greaves) Mids Dunkley, Coniglio, Bontempelli, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, green, Pickett (Sharp, brown) Rucks Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) Fwds Whitfield, stevens, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Schultz, Taylor (Rankine, budarick) Utility Brander What do you think of my team Anybody considering starting either Seb Ross or Jack Steele in their midfield? I think the bont will average more than mccrae and Dunkley this year just have a feeling he will hit 110 I’ve wanted to back Steele for the last two years. I’m confident he’ll average 100+ with Ratten in charge. Just unsure by how much and if it’ll warrant the pick. Hey guys, what are your thoughts on this team? Def – Smith, Houston, Doch, Howe, Roberton, Gould Mid – Kelly, Macrae, Treloar, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Anderson, Picket Ruck – Jacobs, Naismtih Fwd – Martin, Smith, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Patton, Jones Got 48k in the bank, appreciate any feedback. GET GRUNDY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! +1 Treloar wont play first few rounds with a hammy. Would love some opinions on this team. Obviously rookies are subject to change when teams are announced: Def: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Howe, Roberton, Brander (Williams, Watson) Mids: Kelly, Macrae, Coniglio, Mitchell, Viney, Rowell, Green, Pickett (Budarick, Brown) Rucks: Grundy, Naismith (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Steven, Petracca, Brayshaw, Patton, Taylor (Rankine, King) Uti: Xerri Salary $13k Hey lads, anyway to check overall rank from last season? Best combo 1. Grundy and Patton Or 2. Jacobs and Devon smith? I don’t think Patton will score much so 2. RDT Leagues to fill: 738516 Yagobombers 17/18 . 794917 DT Addicts. 16/18 360371 Raw Deal. 11/18 The One, no.2 more output, 2 keepers. Zac.. you could cash in Petracca & Patton for 1 keeper Devon Smith and cash as sort of mentioned to upgrade playing rookies if needed, not sure about Howe. Otherwise all good in my humble opinion. In a pickle of what to do, some advice would be appreciated. Def: Smith, Houston, Doch, Cerra, Roberton, Ash Mid: Dunkley, Coniglio, Adams, Mitchell, A Brayshaw, Hately, Rowell, Pickett Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs Fwd: Devon, Steven, Greenwood, Petracca, Flanders, Rankine 54K left Steven.., main concern is forward rookies on field and not much cash to upgrade come game day. I would be prepared to ditch Mid pricer to improve playing rookies if needed. Have a plan B, for peace of mind. Solid team. thanks will do Thoughts on this team: DEF: Crisp, Houston, doc, roberton, Mcasey, Gould (Brander, Watson) MID: Macrae, Danger, Nigs, Titch, Brayshaw, Rowel, Green, Pickett (Anderson, Starcevich) Ruck: Grundy, Naismith (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Martin, Smith, Petracca, Townsend, Taylor (King, Budarick) UTIL: Rankine Feedback appreciated! Best combo 1. Grundy and Patton Or 2. Jacobs and Devon smith Looks great Tyler, tell me about McAsey, is he good to go .? No. 2 looking for few people for my league JVECULRS Dusty or Jack steven + 65k? Fantasy League XSVDDN53 size 20 starts R1. League has Calvin Roy Warne The Traders and Fantasy Freako. Require 1 more player to fill league. Thanks. 1. Andrew Gaff, Devon Smith & Sam Naismith or 2. Lachie Neale, Chad Wingard & Sauce Jacobs 1. points much the same, more $ to gain Dusty, if he has a go. Anyone here liking Bailey Smith from WBD? 11 tackles on the weekend and around the same in the first game has really caught my eye, anyone see enough upside? His role was good and I like the way he goes about it also. Think there is enough, BUT not sure if worth over some of the other 500k forwards I’ve got him in a group with Ainsworth and rowbottom, but got those two ahead of him on price Looking to fill up my Fantasy classic league. Everyone welcome! East Coast Battle Royale League code: 3C53S2SD Cheers Thoughts? Also I have 409k remaining. Any ideas on where to spend it? DEF: Crisp, Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Brander, (BWilliams, Watson) MID: Macrae, Dunkley, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Green, Sharp, Pickett (Connolly, McHenry) Ruck: Jacobs, Naismith (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Steven, Greenwood, Petracca, Brayshaw, Taylor (King, Rankine) UTIL: Davis Spend it on getting Grundy somehow not sure if you need to have Grundy at his current price but i would be tempted to swap xerri and maybe nicnat placing Naismith as sub? would also look at putting darcy cameron in as utility, i think he will play games this year at the expense of Cox Def: Smith, Doch, Houston, Roberton, Ash, Young (Starcevich, Gould) Mid: Macrae, Cogs, Merrett, Titch, Anderson, Rowell, Pickett, Green (McHenry, Sharp) Ruck: Grundy, Gawn (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Walters, D Smith, Brayshaw, Rankine, King (Cavarra, Budarick) Utility: Smith Thoughts would be greatly appreciated. Not sure about Gawn but I like the thought of set and forget both ruck. I know I’m one less Premium in the mid but it free’s up cash to spend in the other positions and allows you to have the playing rooks. Gawn averaged more than Dunkley, Gaff, Merrett etc so nothing wrong with that pick, but can’t see all of Ash, Young & Rankine playing Rd 1. Defence Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, cumming, zero-thatcher (Gould, greaves) Mids Dunkley, Coniglio, Bontempelli, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, green, Pickett (Sharp, brown) Rucks Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) Fwds Whitfield, stevens, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Schultz, Taylor (Rankine, budarick) Utility Brander What do you think of my team Guys OK guys, this is the only time I will put up my team for RDT. I cannot see too many problems with this team and have enough money to cover any problems should they arise… BACKS. Crisp, Hurn, Docherty, Houston, Roberton, McAsey. (Young, Gould.) MIDS. Macrae, Merrett, Coniglio, Mitchell, Yeo, Rowell, Green, Pickett. (Robertson, Sharp, Budarick.) RUCKS. Grundy, Jacobs. (Conroy.) FWDS. Whitfield, Smith, Brayshaw, Steven, Brander, Taylor. ( Georgiades, King.) $78,500 left in the Bank… all thoughts and criticisms considered…… Rate in order of choice: Sharp, Anderson,Rowell rowell, gap to anderson, chasm to sharp Anderson or Green? Green JS a concern for Green? Hately in front of him in the pecking order surely. Option 1 or 2 Crisp, Deven Robertson & Steven Or Dusty, Madgen/Ash & Viney Cheers Teams seems alright just scared it gonna get shat on. Def: Smith, Houston, Haynes, Doc, Roberton, Ash (Greaves, B.Williams) Mid: J.Kelly, Fyfe, Neale, Bont, Cog, McGrath, Tom Green, Pickett (Budarick, McHenry) Ruck: Jacobs, Naismith (Xerri) Fwd: Parish, Westhoff, Brayshaw, Smith, Simpkin, Curts Taylor (Rankine, King) Utility: Brander It’s very unique that’s for sure.. You need to find a way to get Rowell in though, obvious solution is McGrath down, and then upgrade 1 of Westhoff/Smith Def: Smith Houston Docherty Roberton Madgen Ash (Brander Watson) Mid: Coniglio Bont Mitchell Viney McGrath Rowell Anderson Pickett (Robertson Buderick) Ruc: Grundy Jacobs (Naismith) For: Whitfield Wingard Greenwood Brayshaw Patton Townsend (Rankine King) Utility: Taylor Thoughts would be much appreciated boys I’m stuck Team 1 Smith, Houston, doc, Roberton, ash, Gould (brander, starcevich Macrae, dunks, cogs, titch, Rowell, Anderson, green, picket (sharp, Robertson Grundy, sauce (Naismith) Whitfield, Greenwood, petracca, Brayshaw, Patton, Schultz (king, Rankine Utility Taylor 46 K remaining Or team 2 Smith, Houston, doc, Roberton, ash, Gould (Greaves, starcevich Macrae, dunks, cogs, titch, hopper, Rowell, Anderson, green (Pickett Grundy, Naismith ( Cameron) Whitfield Greenwood petracca Brayshaw Patton brander (king, Rankine) Utility Taylor 73 K remaining Team 1 i like 2 because risking the ruck combo Ash might not be round 1 start Picket on the ground Who for Rick combo Grundy & Jacobs Or Grundy $ Stefan Martin Grundy and jacobs. Stef has shakers ruck with big O *Shared +1 Crisp & Greenwood or Smith & Dusty Def: Sicily, Houston, Doc, Roberton,Cumming, Gould (Goddard and Williams) Mid: Macrae, B Crouch, Oliver, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Sharp, Pickett (Brown, Mclernery) Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs (Xerri) Forward: Whitfield, MacPherson, Brayshaw, Bonar, Brander, Rankine (Cameron, King) Utility: Budarick Bank :309k looking for some advise and opinons on my team also maybe some better options really looking for vaule with what i got well what do we make of that weekend guys and gals, r ur teams locked and loaded lol from the foot fetish girl who loves her feet in baked beans Thoughts? open to criticism. $1k left. Def: Docherty, Roberton, Houston, Br. Smith, Starcevich, Brander ( Gould, Goddard) Mid: Bontempelli, Coniglio, A. Brayshaw, T. Mitchell, Martin, Parish, Anderson, Rowell (Pickett, Mchenry) Rucks: Grundy, Jacobs ( Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Petracca, Ba.Smith, Papley, Schultz, Georgiades (Rankine, King) Util: Xerri Schultz needed 4 goals to put up a decent score, what is he going to score with none? How is this team? DEF: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Gould, Brander, (Williams, Greaves) MID: Dunkley, Danger, Cogs, Titch, MacPherson, Rowell, Green, Pickett, (Brown, McInerney) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs, (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Parish, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Snelling, Townsend, (Rankine, King) UTILITY: Budarick Haven’t been on DT for over 5 years so wanting to hear thoughts on my lineup Crisp – Houston – Doc – Roberton – Gould – Young (McLennan / Greaves) Macrae – Gaff – Coniglio – McCluggage – Mitchell – Rowell – Anderson – Pickett (McHenry / Collier-Dawks) Grundy – English (Cameron) Whitfield – McPherson – Rozee – Brayshaw – Davis – Sturt (Rankine / King) UTI: Xerri Bench rooks will most likely change with R1 lineups DEF: Br. Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Brander, Gould (Starcevich, Greaves) MID: Dunkley, Merrett, Coniglio, Mitchell, Zorko, Rowell, Sharp, Pickett (McInerney, McHenry) RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron, Budarick (UTL)) FWD: Whitfield, Petracca, Parish, Brayshaw, Bonar, Townsend (Rankine, King) Sharp or Anderson ??? Thoughts DEF: J. Lloyd, J. Sicily, D. Houston, S. Docherty, D. Roberton, W. Gould. (D. Greaves, B.Williams) MID: L. Neale, P. Cripps, T. Mitchell, D. Hannebery, T. Cutler, M. Rowell, T. Green, M. Pickett. (L. Valente, R. Collier-Dawkins) RUC: B. Grundy, S. Jacobs. (T. Xerri) FWD: L. Whitfield, T. Greene, C. Petracca, J. Townsend, W. Snelling, M. King. (S. Sturt, D. Cameron) UTL: M. Georgiades Got 29k left This is my team so far, are there any players I should get rid of then who should I try get in? Will most of these rookies play or not? What does everyone think of this side open to change it up. Tom Cutler? Dan Hannebery? Eeeek… None of your bench is going to play apart from Sturt and Georgiades who will both average 40 tops. I’d go Cutler to Anderson and Hannebery to a premium (Dangerfield maybe). What’s the best combo here? 1. Danger + Schultz 2. Pendles + Bewley 3. Zorko + Bewley I’m currently at 3 but I would like to know what you guys think. 3 Or 4: Crocker + Josh Kelly Who should score more J Steven or C Wingard ? Steven i think Wingard, if he can stay fit. from the foot fetish girl who loves her feet in bake beans Research done, Locking my team in. DEF: J Crisp, B Smith, D Houston, S Docherty, W Gould, B Starcevich (D Greaves, H Goddard) MID: J Macrae, P Cripps, S Coniglio, T Mitchell, E Curnow, M Rowell, J Sharp, M Pickett (J Bytel, N Mchenry) RUC: B Grundy, S Jacobs (D Cameron) FWD: L Whitfield, H Greenwood, C Rozee, A Brayshaw, J Brander, B Davis (M King, I Rankine) UTL: C Budarick 38k in the bank, and looking forward to ROUND ONE. Good luck everyone! English and townsend/rook/midpricer up to 500k or naismith and steven *already have brayshaw Upgraded my team post preseason, thoughts? DEF Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Cerra, Lukosius, Roberton (T.Watson, Kennerley) MID Macrae, Dangerfield, Coniglio, Adams, T.Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (D.Robertson, T.Brown) RUC Jacobs, Naismith (Cameron) FWD Whitfield, MacPherson, Petracca, Brayshaw, Patton, Crocker (King, Rankine) UTL (C.Taylor) $4k in bank Put Williams in D8 for Kennerley as he’s a good chance to play Round 1** I would say “chance” not “good”, will be unlikely. I like the structure of this team. Struggling to see how it fits into budget, which is a good thing! Seems to be slightly weak on the rookies. I would personally hate to miss the likes of Green, Serong/Stephens in a year with limited rooks and face having to use 2 trades to get a 170ker up to them. Other than that I quite like what you have done. I can see how it fits into budget now, no Grundy! Gosh. Some spots left in new Draft League – “Killer Coaches”. Code/pin is NYTSHT6L. Live Draft this Thursday 12th March at 6pm AEDT. Head-to-head matchups start in Round One. Please join if keen to stick with it the whole season! G’day boys. Rookies are absolutely killing us atm and I’ve had to change my team up a bit to compensate. Would love your comments DEF: B. Smith, Dawson, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Gould (Greeves, Williams) MID: Macrae, Coniglio, Cripps, Macpherson, Titchell, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (McHenry, Starcevich) RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Rozee, Brayshaw, Taylor, Budarick (Rankine, M. King) UTL: Xerri $8k left. Very tempted to pick up Naismith for R2 to save money and upgrade some of the rooks I have around. Your team will look better if you do! Good Luck™®© RDT Def – Crisp, Doc, Houston, Roberton, Ash, Starcevich (Greaves, Gould) Mid – Macrae, Dunkley, Oliver, Coniglio, Titch, Rowell, Green, Pickett (McHenry, Robertson, Budarick) Ruck – Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) Fwd – Whitfield, Dusty, MacPherson, Brayshaw, Townsend, Flanders (Taylor, King) $98,000 left Any thoughts? Not Sure Ash, Starcevich, Greaves, Gould, McHnery, Robertson, Flanders are in the best 22… As you know with RDT limited trades means you need to nail your rookies and i feel you haven’t done that.. Good Luck™®© Thanks, the rooks at the moment are just place holders, using some e pensive to ensure I can make easy changes once teams are out. Good luck to you to ? I finally think that I have finished my team for RDT…. Backs. Lloyd, Crisp, Docherty, Houston, Ash, McAsey. (Watson, Gould.) Mids. Macrae, Merrett, Coniglio, Mitchell, Yeo, Rowell, Anderson, Green. (Robertson, Sharp, Budarick.) Rucks. Grundy, Jacobs. ( Conroy.) Fwds. Whitfield, Smith, Brayshaw, Steven, Brander, Georgiades. (Taylor, King.) only have $67,700 left in the Bank… All thoughts and comments will be appreciated… be harsh if you want… Few holes there. No Pickett? Change Green to Pickett, Georgiades to Schultz, Gould to Williams (WC) and Conroy to Cameron/Xerri Would love some thoughts on my team guys. Everyone is so helpful so I just would also like to thank everyone who helps others than just asking for their own accord! Remaining: 4k DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Young, Starcevich (Williams, Watson) MID: Dunkley, Fyfe, Cogs, Cripps, Titch, Rowell, Anderson, Sharp (Pickett, Brown) RUC: Grundy, Gawn (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Patton, Brander, Taylor (Rankine, King) UTL: McInerney Tobe Watson a stretch for R1 but might make it later in the year. Young might play for Hill, but didn’t play a Marsh game – I have him in for now but it is wait and see. Starc I would only have on the bench. Good mids and rucks, not sure about Fyfe though, don’t think he will be top 6. Forwards and rucks very good as well. Tobe Watson is a good chance to play as the 3rd tall with Pearce & Hamling out 15 rookies (bench+field) is far too many this year IMO. A lot of whom you have picked (8/15) I’d say will not play round 1. I would be trying to find more value where you can to decrease your amount of overall rookies. too much value in the rucks to start with gawn imo. downgrade him to sauce/naismith and use that cash to upgrade some of them def and fwd rookies to mid pricers. Thoughts on McCluggage guys? 116 and 89 across the 2 games. Playing more of an inside mid role this year. Priced at 91, what can he average? I’m bullish on him He was on my short list of potential break outs and i think he will go the 101 but for me there is not enough upside. Good Luck™®© Hey guys. Bit late to the party, but just started playing around with my team. Is it just me, or do rookies just suck balls this year? Apart from a few obvious picks….cobwebs. Yep they do. Even if we get some 170k bolter round 1 I still feel as though I will be paying up this year. I only have 2 players under 250k on my field and one of them is Pickett, Need to look a little higher for value with the limited pool of round 1 rookies. Good Luck™®© I have 1 atm, with F6 up for grabs.. I’m currently running with 3, but left with more cash in the bank then I’d like atm i reckon the other is brander DEF: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Cerra, Roberton, Cumming (McAsey, Watson) MID: Macrae, Dunkley, Coniglio, Titchell, Rowell, Anderson, Green, Pickett (Serong, Robertson) RUC: Grundy, Naismith (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Petracca, Brayshaw, Bewley, Patton (Taylor, Rankine) UTL: King Remaining: 0K This is how my team lines up heading into round 1 selection & further news, what are your thoughts? really great team mate. won’t have to worry about those fwd and def rookies scoring like shite when you don’t own any! might just think about taking this strategy into my own team. however, don’t be surprised when petracca disappoints round 1. one of the best and most interesting teams i’ve seen on here yet. It’s definitely unique, but I’d say a bit too reliant on the mid pricers with too much $$ sitting on the pine in McAsey, Serong & Robertson.. I’d be looking at dropping Cerra to a 170k (Williams?) and playing McAsey, and a similar move with Bewley/Patton (to a rookie) with the extra $$ allowing you to upgrade Serong/Robertson to an under priced MID for M5 Doug with that strategy, I really want to come up against your team in round 1. Seems like you’re using a strategy from 2018 you confident Cerra will get mid time? hasn’t looked good in Marsh. i like what you have done value wise, probably one decent mid short for mine though but should get most on field playing round 1 IMO yes, look at the defenders that Fremantle were missing in that game, someone had to go and play down there. Also, especially those who know me in the DT community here. Jump in my league AF: XS2ZKUMC RDT: 456907 Comment on this message if you are in :) I’m happy to take the easy win :) Good Luck™®© in both, cheers 1. Zmerrt and viney 2. Cripps and Adams? Viney is great value, but Adams has a higher ceiling, so 2 for me.. Westhoff and Patton Or deven Smith and taylor/Davis 170k player don’t like westhoff, so i’d have to say option 2. however, i think patton is value. Any help or thoughts , thanks Def – smith , Houston, doc , Roberton, Gould , brander ( Williams , greaves ) Mids- mccrea , Conigs , Neale , tmitch , green , Rowell , Robertson, Stephens ( Pickett , starcevich) Rucks – Grundy , Jacobs ( Cameron ) Fwds – whit , dusty, Stevens , McPherson , Stuart, Georgiadis ( king , rankine ) Ult – McHenry Bank – 273k some of those rookies will really hurt your scores (Gould, Brander, Stephens, Georgiades, sturt) i’d recommend reshuffling some of your premiums to some mid pricers/fallen premos to be able to upgrade some of the guys mentioned above. This is not the year to be going guns and rookies. Which option will score the most? 1. Grundy and Rookie (Sharp if he plays) 2. Jacobs and Viney 120+50=170 80+90=170 1 gives you a pig captain option plus a risky rook. 2 gives you 2 mid pricers with great JS. Sharp is a gun think you’ve under sold his scoring 65-75 Been playing this game for over a decade, planning anything over 50 for a rook is asking for dissapointment. +1.. Good Luck™®© so your not playing any rooks on field? Using that logic you shouldn’t, should really be a case by case basis This is what my team will look like heading into round 1. Any thoughts and suggestions would be much appreciated! DEF: B. Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Young, Brander (Watson, Williams) MID: Macrae, Gaff, Merrett, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (McHenry, Brown) RUC: Grundy, Naismith (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Smith, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Patton, Taylor (King, Rankine) UTL: Xerri Remaining: 13K my team is the exact same, but ive got gould instead of brander Feels wrong, but I’m thinking of not starting with Macrae, anyone else doing this? Figure the $$ (and POD) for going down to Merrett, Oliver, or even Yeo could be handy elsewhere.. I am not starting with him better value around IMO and it allows you to free up some cash to cover the lack of decent rookies in 2020.. Good Luck™®© My M1 sits below 780k on that reasoning wouldnt it be better if you dnt start with grundy over anyone? Hey guys would love some feedback on this Don’t feel right starting without Whitfield but gotta risk it to get the biscuit basically just to upgrade my rookies on bench for cash generation Backline: B.Smith, Docherty, roberton, houston, cumming & Gould ( Williams, brander ) Midfield: Josh kelly, Coniglio, Titch, Bontempelli, Viney, Rowell, sharp, Pickett ( Robertson, McHenry ) Rucks: Grundy, sauce Jacobs ( Cameron ) Forward: Dusty, dev smith, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Townsend, zac Langdon ( King, Rankine ) Thoughts guys would be appreciated and good to be back for 2020 Who is the better pick Taylor Adams and Brodie Smith or Tom Mitchell and Sam Docherty I just thinking because brodie smith will easy average 95+ coming off the Half Back and Taylor Adams will average what i think near 110 Where Tom Mitchell is maybe the 105 mark and sam Docherty around 90 Im not sure This is probably a stupid question Understand your thinking, but the Doc & Titch (when fit) are almost the greatest ever Fantasy scorers at their positions, averages for both should be 115+ and 105+ easily.. Yeah i think my brain is not being smart today Probably what I will roll into round 1 with. Went against starting Whitfield because I feel like he is only 1 tagged game from a steep drop in price (see the finals series).Madgen only slightly more expensive than McAsey and scored a lot more during preseason games so figured it was worth the punt Def: Crisp, Smith, Docherty, Roberton, Cumming, Madgen (Brander, Watson) Mid: Dunkley, Danger, Coniglio, Mitchell, Houston, Rowell, Anderson, Green (Sharp, Pickett) Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) Fwd: Steven, Macpherson, Brayshaw, Bewley, Schultz, Taylor (King, Budarick) Uti: Xerri/Cameron 26k remaining We have many same! Good Luck™®© Would like to get some feedback on my current RDT. Def: Crisp, Weller, Docherty, Houston, Roberton, BZT (Young, Gould) Mid: Kelly, Macrae, Gaff, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Pickett, Green (Anderson, Sharp, Budarick) Ruck: Jacobs, Naismith (132k loophole option) Fwd: Whitfield, Dusty, Devon, Brayshaw, Steven, Taylor (Rankine, King) With Crisp->Brodie or/& Dusty->Ceglar/Greenwood in hand i can fix any rookies not named to the other names like Brander/Townsend/Ash ect. Too much value in the ruck to pass on, i’m happy to walk the walk on that rather than just talk the talk. Opinions? Remember its not just 1 Grundy you get… Good Luck™®© Anyone considering starting either Seb Ross or Jack Steele in their midfield? I think the bont will average more than mccrae and Dunkley this year just have a feeling he will hit 110 hi guys, 1) Sic & Jacobs 2) Lloyd and Naismith very conflicted AFL FANTASY DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Mcasey, Gould (Brander, Watson) MID: Macrae, Danger, Coniglio, Yeo, Rowel, Anderson, Green, Pickett (Budarick, Starcevich) RUC: Grundy, Naismith (Xerri) FWD: Whitfield, Martin, Smith, Brayshaw, Townsend, Taylor (Sturt, King) UTILITY: Rankine I have 309k in the bank to play with, however i’m not sure what to do with it. Not sure about the midfield structure of 4 guns and 4 rooks but I think that’s where money can be made (could move one to the bench and upgrade to another gun)? Feedback would be appreciated. Pick one Bont Zmerret Danger Cripps Pendles Yeo Steele? if you don’t already have macrae and dunkley id say Bont Yeo Danger Merret Cripps Steele Pendles Best mid for $737k Got titch already Thanks Hey guys second year doing this think I’m getting the hang of it.. Any help would be appreciated =) Def Crisp, smith, doc, Houston, roberton, young Goddard, gould Mid Gaff, neale, Mitchell, cripps, hannerbury, Rowell, pickett, serong, Robertson, mchenry, mcinerny Ruck Grundy, Jacobs(possibly nic Nat derby pending), zerri Fwds Whitfield, Martin, petracca, smith, Hill, brander Bruderick, King 57k bank Thanks in advance I like your defense, but I don’t like the FWDs, I think there are too many risky picks there Cheers.. Risky as in petracca and Smith?.. Watching this week’s footy to see who gets those spots… Had petracca last year and his role looks good fingers crossed.. Not sold on Smith though No I like Smith (in defense but not the one up forward I would rather have someone like Greenwood), I meant Risky like Hill, and the job security on some rooks on your ground (Brander, Serong, Petracca could either burn you hard or boost you up the rankings a lot it’s up to you on him. I’ve just changed smith to brayshaw after watching the derby.. Rookies are subject to change I just wanted to spend more cash on my on fields cuz I figured was easier to downgrade for round one selections than upgrade to more expensive ones if needed.. Hill is a bit of a make or break pod for me… He’s Def in their 22.. I’m hoping for 70/80 for a rookie price fingers crossed Maybe use the cash you you got from Smith to Brayshaw to upgrade a rook or Hill? I am a freo supporter and I reckon Hill might be on limited minutes for the first few rounds… Also don’t bother with NicNat he will be on limited minutes too. Other than that there would only be a few changes I would make, but nothing big, it’s good to keep your team your own! what is everyone doing with Jones and Poholke after yesterday’s game? i’m thinking bewley and georgiades, but not very confident at all. I’m doing the same as I think with Acres injury Bewley should score well Thoughs on Gold Coast Rookies – How many is too many. Currently looking at up to 5 in my team. Is this too many? I currently have 4 but will be 5 if Sharp gets a game 4 for me. Rowell, Anderson, Sharp and Rankine. R6W92JE2 Houtson, Docherty, Cerra, Roberton, McAsey, Gould (Mclennan,Watson) Macrae, Gaff, Merrett, Walsh, Mitchell, Rowell, Serong, Pickett (Robertson, McHenry) Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) Whitfield, Smith, Greenwood, Patton, Townsend Georgiades (Davis,King) Utility: Brander. Bank: 35k Got a bit of cash on the bench, but i think cash generation is going to be important this season. But defs open for suggestions! A few interesting PODs there, not sure I would pick them but I guess that’s why they are PODs… Very solid team mate, very similar to mine with just 4 differences! thanks mate! What four you got different? No Cerra, Gaff, Merrett or Walsh for me. Bench rookies different too. Def: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Young, Gould (Greaves, Keane) Mid: Macrae, Dunks, Oliver, Tich, Andy Brayshaw, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (McHenry, Budarick) Ruc: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Wingard, Greenwood, Rozee, Bewley, Georgiades (King, Davis) Utl: Rankine 19k remaining Thanks for your thoughts Hi everyone final team this week DEF Daniel,Houston, Docherty,Ash, Rivers,Starcevich (Goddard,McKay ) MID Macrae, Dunkley, Mitchell, E Curnow S Walsh,J Hopper, Serong,Pickett (Bytel.McHenry) RUC Grundy,Jacobs(Xerri ) FOR Whitfield, Greenwood,Rozee,Patton,Georgiades.Brander (Rankine, king) Utility(Cameron) 96000$ left any suggestions please and goodluck Too many rooks in the backline, replace one with Rowell, pretty much too many rooks everywhere except mid Not sold on Whitfield, is he injured still or has he recovered from surgery, he will definetly struggle and miss games. You can use the money to fix other lines as he will drop quite heavily and players with value will score equal or around his output. Good choice on hopper with the tarantula out and kelly on the wing with cigs half forward. I too have him but Whitfield you need to downgrade him as he is too dear for a crippled fella This is a fake Campbell Play origin you clown Not sure if you watched State of Origin but Whitefield played in that game and showed no signs of struggling after his surgery. He looked primed for a big season Yes I know. The Campbell who keeps going on about Whitfield is fake… I am the real one DEF: J.Crisp, D.Houston, S.Docherty, D.Roberton, L.Ash, W.Gould (J.Brander, B.Starcevich) MID: J.Macrae, J.Dunkley, S.Coniglio, T.Mitchell, M.Rowell, N.Anderson, C.Serong, M.Pickett (J.McInerney, J.Sharp) RUC: B.Grundy, M.Gawn (S.Naismith) FWD: L.Whitfield, D.MacPherson, A.Brayshaw, B.Bewley, A.Bonar S.Sturt (M.King, I.Rankine) UTIL: C.Budarick Thoughts? There goes my POD in English as R2. Now watch all these seagulls jump on board Yes especially that bullant09 fella, he doesn’t do anything on this site apart from poach and troll Hahaha lol Evie, U go girl, by the way I dont mind your team good luck this year from the foot fetish girl who loves her feet in bake beans Hawk see a doctor mate , you shouldnt b walking the streets, your not rite in the head I am Sam Hawk Menegola ©™ Good Luck™®© There are serious bugs in the AF Draft program. Only today was I able to put the C n VC on .[thx support] Just been in a live draft—half way through players already selected were in the pool with ticks in the ignore box. This is impossible roll on SC 2021. My C and VC has been the same LLizardofoz, sent support a please explain and they said it was my end, hopefully when I log on know I’ll have them, very frustrating from the foot fetish girl who loves her feet in bake beans woohoo finally fixed, thanks support, hopefully ill be competitive know from the foot fetish girl who like her feet in bake beans Wouldn’t mind some thoughts on this team, will comment on a few above also. DEF; Smith, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Ash, McAsey (Gould, Watson) MID: Macrae, Oliver, Coniglio, Mitchell, Viney, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (Sharp, McInerney) RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, MacPherson, Rozee, Brayshaw, Brander, Rankine (King, Davis) UTL: Brown/Sturt. $15,000 left in the bank. F5/6 weak, but may as well try and maximise the points elsewhere. Otherwise, will drop Smith to Cerra and upgrade Rankine to Bonar. looks good, similar to mine, don’t get Bonar, I also do not like Ash, as I don’t think he will play… Or you can downgrade Whitfield for extra cash as he may struggle this year…… I don’t have him in my team Don’t do that Shut up fake me Best combo 1. Viney, Whitfield, Dawson and Patton 2. Viney, Dusty, Smith and Patton 3. Cripps, Westhoff, Dawson and Andrew brayshaw? 1 2 or 3 I’m lovin the Utility, going to make things interesting this year, hated it to start off with. from the foot fetish girl who loves her feet in bake beans Errrrrrr…. low salt or regular baked beans ??? Depends if you got cuts on your feet. lol no cuts, but it doesnt matter How many rookies can we really see playing round 1? Rookies look so thin in the backline I can’t see it viable to start any more than 1 def rookie on field Suggestions: DEF: Houston, laird, docherty, D. Roberton, young, Gould . (Greaves, Goddard) MID: Whitfield, macrea, boak, neale, Mitchell, Rowell, picket, Anderson. (Mchenry, starcevich) RUCK: Grundy, Nic Nat (Cameron) FWDS: Martin, Brayshaw, petracca, Greenwood, Townsend, Rankine. (King, Davis) (Budarick) Still got $102k left. Good cash keeping, not sure weather to spend it upgrading someone!!!! Thoughts??? Upgrade Nicnat Or drop Starcevich to a basement priced rookie and get Naismith for R3 Was thinking Nic Nat for Jacobs( but unsure how much actual game time he will get with mummy ) Mummy shouldn’t play Swapped Nic Nat for jacobs, jumped Rankine on the bench, got rid of Davis- for J.Brander(F6). H.Young for L.Ash… ‘liking this fit $21k left bank’ I’ve got 72k left and I need help finding a way to spend it. Maybe upgrade a defender or midfield rook? DEF: Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Young, Starcevich (Watson, Kennerley) MID: Dunkley, Fyfe, Cripps, Adams, Mitchell, Rowell, Stephens, Pickett (Brown, McInerney) RUC: Grundy, Gawn (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Patton, Townsend, Davis (Rankine, King) UTL: Budarick Cheers everyone. Will also give advice back on team if you’d like Maybe downgrade Gawn to ROB and upgrade someone cheap, Davis or Starcevich maybe. Advice on my team would be great thanks Def: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Young, Gould (Greaves, Keane) Mid: Macrae, Dunks, Oliver, Tich, Andy Brayshaw, Rowell, Anderson, Pickett (McHenry, Budarick) Ruc: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Wingard, Greenwood, Rozee, Bewley, Georgiades (King, Davis) Utl: Rankine 19k remaining DEF: stock-standard I also have Young but be wary as he’s under and injury cloud and may not be fit for round 1. Gould has been left out on Monday’s team for Sydney so his prospects for a round 1 debut look low so you may need to trade him out. MID: Brayshaw needs to be in your forward line. It’s a waste having him in your midfield, even for ‘dpp’. RUC: not a fan of Jacobs. I’m more of a set and forget type of ruck combo player FWD: very midprice, I’d expect one of Wingard Rozee Greenwood not to live up to expectation as that’s the way the cookie crumbles. I would downgrade one of them (rozee) to a Patton then move Andy Brayshaw to the forward line and trade Wingard to a premo midfielder. Not sure on Bewley best 22 and scoring potential. Not my cup of tea. Georgiades isn’t a scorer, for his scoring potential, may as well play Ben Davis from the crows for 66k cheaper and out rankine on bench. Currently it’s a wait and see on backline rookies atm. I am a freo supporter and I think Bewley will probably be best 22, it’s him v Patton atm. Got rid of georgiades for Sharp in the midfield. Switched Rozee to Petracca but if he fails R1 hes straight out. As my bench is a bit thin I am chasing value in the forward line. I have Brayshaw in mids just because I think he is the best option for that price there thanks for your help Hey guys, would love some thoughts on this team. Pretty much sold on it and unlikely to change besides rookies Def: B.smith, Sicily, Houston, docherty, Roberton, Ash (brander, starcevich) Mid: macrae, B.crouch, coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson, green, Pickett (McHenry, budarick) Ruck: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Greenwood, petracca, Brayshaw, bewley, rankine (king, Davis) UTL: collier-Dawkins Not a bad team, Very similar to mine. Not sure on Sicily, as he burnt me too many times last year. Also, not sold on Petracca. I think he will be too risky with consistency. Do you have the cash to upgrade him to Macpherson. Need to get rankine out of F6, he wont be playing R1. Best combo 1. Viney, Whitfield, Dawson and Patton 2. Viney, Dusty, Smith and Patton 3. Cripps, Westhoff, Dawson and Andrew brayshaw? 1 2 or 3. 3 Brayshaw, Whitfield, Dawson, Patton 1 or 2 ???? 1: Devon Smith & Hunter Clarke 2: Rory Laid & Bailey Smith 2 Probably 1. But dont trust Dawson. Why are people jumping off Jake Lloyd? Back yourself…. Good Luck™®© Westhoff or Greenwood No…. Greenwood. Good Luck™®© R4J2M7D2 Draft starts in 2hours jump in Draft at 2pm 3UCKK6ZU Walters and starcevich or Michael Hibberd and jack Steven Thoughts please Michael Hibberd can sometimes get stricter defensive roles that can limit his scoring a bit. Added element of risk picking him IMO 1. Whitfield and Patton Or 2. Greenwood and westhoff? 1. Simply because of the lack of westhoff. Thoughts? Feel like 1 less rook on field would be nice, but would probably have to downgrade ROB to a jacobs to do it. 22k remaining Def: Crisp, Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Brander, Gould (Williams, McLennan) Mid: J.Kelly, Macrae, Dunkley, Mitchell, Rowell, green, Sharp, Pickett (McHenry, Bytel) Ruck: Grundy, ROB (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Greenwood, petracca, Rozee, Brayshaw, Davis (king, Rankine) UTL: Starcevich could downgrade kelly to Adams instead Roberton needs to get to at least d5 due to the shortage of rookies. Axe Greenwood/Petracca/Rozee/Brayshaw to 300k type and upgrade Davis to another 300k type. As it stands you’ve probably got 2/8 rookies on your pine playing and 4 on your ground that might struggle to get a game also. You have 15 rookies (players under 270k) that’s way too high this year, you need to be getting that number down closer to 12 if you can. 1. Whitfield and Patton Or 2. Greenwood and patracca? You just asked this question, but replaced Westhoff with Petracca Obviously you feel like you can’t go without Whitfield, but you don’t like Patton, So dump Patton, downgrade someone and upgrade Patton, Or go with your own gut, but stop asking the same question 4 times within the time span of 8 hours I’ve taken a risky approach to this team’s midfield, am I being misguided, or is it worth the risk?: Def: Docherty, Crisp, Houston, Smith, Roberton, Ash (McLennan, Starcevich) Mid: Neale, Mitchell, Yeo, Adams,Viney, Rowell, Flanders, Pickett (Bytel, McHenry) For: Whitfield, Brayshaw, Rozee, Snelling, Max King, Schultz (Rankine, Mosquito) Utl: Budarick. Do I have enough strength in that midfield, or should I go back to the drawing board. Forgot; Ruck: Grundy (c), Jacobs (Cameron) Don’t read too much into Snelling and Rozee for their star performances last week, I’d be picking only one of those. Roberton I don’t trust one bit, I think he’ll hit a hiccup and you’ll be left with a 320k defender not playing and needs to be replaced by Round 2. Ash had a great game but will be fighting for a spot with cumming, < he might be someone who’s a good replacement for Roberton. I wouldn’t be picking Viney, not a guy I would be choosing for fantasy Purposes, his disposal efficiency usually poor and with 2 wingmen coming into the squad, plus Brayshaw returning inside, he might be edged out of the middle. I like the schultz pick, Had Gus Brayshaw in my midfield all preseason and just replaced him with his younger brother.??? Anyone know why Zac Williams hasn’t played both Marsh games? I’m guessing he is injured but this hasn’t been mentioned on any injury lists!? he’ll be right for round 1, probably displacing Ash in the process I heard Achilles soreness and they were being cautious since it was an Achilles injury that kept him out in 2018, they could even rest him the first few rounds since they are so stacked no point risking him. Thoughts on ceglar? Can surely be a low 90s average as the main ruck Low 90s is a stretch. He could get to 80-85 though HEy guys. I’ve had danger and Cripps in my team all preseason but I had a reshuffle and only have room for one. So the question is danger or Cripps Trust your gut, both equal to me My gut says Cripps because he has midfield support his year and he won’t rest foward like danger. Eddie Betts of Levi Casboult F4 ??? I already have banker is in the ruck .. I think u are a Carlton support and u shouldn’t pick either. Their is a lot of value foward this year and thouse guys aren’t options. Her are some names. Wingard, Greenwood, Petracca, Brayshaw, Patton, bonar. Look at those guys instead. I know his scores in the past season were nothing to write about but is anyone considering J. Madgen from the pies? Good value for a defender (288k) and had two solid hit outs during JLT I prefer Cumming for that 300k type player over Madgen Anyone know what’s happening to W.gould Sydney?? Got him as D6 !! Omitted from a squad of 26… I see, cheers for that. Did see he play first marsh but half game and he’s not playing second…. now I’m stuck. Back to draw board I go… rookie D6. Suggestions?? McAsey the most likely rookie. Heavily considering Cumming for d6 or finding the cash to slide Roberton to d6. Brander, Ash or Watson (Dockers)…. Ash won’t play with Williams coming back and Cumming ahead of him What can we see the following players averaging; M Crouch D Parish D MacPherson O Florent s Naismith M Crouch: 105-108 D Parish: 85-90 D MacPherson: 92 O Florent: 80-85 S Naimsith: 65-70 (hoping he does as he sits at R2 for me after today) 104 82 87 74 70 Whats everyones thoughts on Boak as a POD, can he be a top 8 midfielder? He looks like he is going to lead the mids at Port. He’s my M4 – priced well average 105. (But thinking on coniglio 20K cheaper and can see him having a breakout year this year… I’m undecided myself boak or coniglio…. Starting to seriously consider Naismith as R2 to help get a rookie out of the midfield (currently have four). Think it’s worth a shot?? Could do! How would it leave the rest of your team? I have Naismith r2 but would need Patton/Ceglar in the fwd, which I have Patton f6. For example if Naismith is given a rest you don’t want to be wasting 2 trades on him only to miss a week, especially if it occurs when he is say 300k and still has a lot of money to make. DEF: Houston, Docherty, Cerra, Roberton, Ash, Brander MID: Macrae, Dunkley, Cogs, Adams, Titch, Rowell, Anderson, Serong RUCK: Grundy, Lycett FWD: Whitfield, Wingard, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Bewley, Rankine Obviously rookies are subject to change depending on rd1 but unsure if it’s too many mid pricers. Not sold on the freo boys mate. Like the Adams pick if he stays fit. probably get out bewley and lycett due to the china game being cancelled Does this team fit into the salary cap? yeah 15k left over with all 170k bench rookies, even more if I downgrade bewley to another rookie which is likely Lycett means you have plenty of cash to spend. Unfortunately, it also means you have Lycett on the park i like you have paid up for rookies gives more wiggle room if things change Would love some feedback. DEF: Crisp,Houston, Docherty, Roberton, Ash, Gould MID: Macrae, Merrett, Danger, Cogs, Titch, Rowell, Serong, Pickett RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs FWD: Martin, Greenwood, Petracca, Dawson, Flanders, Rankine 12k Left Very solid team Dawson is the only worry his roll may change week by week but if he doesn’t get thrown forward at all he will be great Yeah i was waiting to see how he goes with Lloyd and Mills back in the team but could swing him to the defence and bring Sicily in his place. Don’t like not having whitfield but wanted to maximise a line with few rookies around Yeah I’ve got sicdog ATM but the his roll may change week 2 week as well so might go Ryan I reckon What does everyone think, B: Cerra, Docherty, Ash, Saad, Lloyd, Gould. Mid: Cripps, Kelly(gws), Rowell, Neale, Houston, Dusty, Mitchell, Danger. R: Ceglar, Naismith F: Fritsch, Rozee, Ratugolea, Kennedy(wce) A Brayshaw, King. Int: Pickett, Rankine +others As a Swan supporter I’m not sold on Dawson with his price I think it might be a bit to much. I would love to pick him but not at that price Serong won’t play IMO I reckon he will. Has has a good preseason, starred in the intraclub and has been talked up as playing midfield by the coaching staff. Good scorer as a junior too. Should be good hopefully… Sowrong about that. Kids a beast my pick to win the rising star you just wanted to tell your dad joke didnt you? I reckon he will too he most definitely will play barring injury. the little time he played he was grade all class Love the backline, i had Crisp in as a lock before he played last week based on his finish to 2019 Mids look good value there with some fire power, not the same ones i picked except Titch Grundy is must have, im not sold on Jacobs but see the value but what would i know he comes out averages 95 your a genius, he comes out goes down with an injury round 1 you will struggle to replace him but saying that there are some other low priced rucks you could change to Looks good, hope Pet gets up for you this week will show more, same with Dawson Hi everyone first team post for the year DEF crips, sicdog, Houston, doc, Ash, young (gould, greaves) MID dunks, Oliver, cripps, mitchall, rowell, Anderson, sorong, green (Pickett, McHenry) RUC grundy, Jacobs (camron utility rantall) FOR Whitfield, heeney, greenwood, petracca, brandar, budarick (Rankin, king) Please give me some feed back an thoughts on this team only have $1000 left in the bank so not much to play with. Crips, dunks, grundy an Whitfield are locks the rest are changeable Thanks an good luck I imagine that is Crisp down back, not sold on Brander, Sicdog or Petracca, promise so much and deliver so little. Green is a wait and see as are all the rooks. Petracca down to Rozee and maybe Sicdog to Roberton to free up some cash…. good luck. Yeah not sold on sicdog either don’t trust Roberton what do u think of Ryan? Did have Lynch (rich) but petracca did look really fit an covered the ground well c if he plays mid again this week an yeah I like rozee at that price as well Ryan is a pod mate Budarick won’t play Def: Smith, Houston, Docherty, Robertson, Young, Gould (Greaves, Williams) Mid: J Kelly, Dunkley, Oliver, Bont, Titch, Rowell, D Stephens, Pickett (McHenry, Collier-Dawkins) Ruck: Grundy, ROB (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Dawson, Brayshaw, C Jones, Georgiades, King (Budarick, Rankine) Utility: Starcevich 78k in bank Few thoughts so far: – aiming to get 40 k more to get Naismith as R3 as he’d be a cash cow. To do so, was thinking of downgrading Jones to Townsend or potentially downgrade a mid premo like Bont or Dunkley to someone slightly cheaper. – Rookies will depend on who’s playing Rd1, but would Young to Ash be the best move if he’s not named? – worried about picks like Dawson and Bont tbh, any ideas how they’d score this season? They’re usually not the best scorers, but are getting a good amount of attention now Any tips and advice is appreciated, Cheers! the hype around Jones is just that hype he’d be lucky to Ave 55 not worth the pick imo but don’t go down to Townsend he’s worse Dawson could be great if he plays that halfback wing roll it’s a big IF bont down to Adams might get the cash u need Agreed – I had Jones until his second JLT, really hasn’t shown much IMO Not a bad team as all, maybe downgrade Kelly to Cogs or Yeo to get some cash… Ash won’t play. Naismith is juicey. Will average 50. Ash named on ground, he is a very good chance to play round 1. Coach has already said as much. Where Do you get the idea Bont is not usually a good scorer? 7 of his last 11 games last year were 100+ Including 124 125 138 139. Big challenge are the rooks – Greaves didn’t feature in the R2 match which doesn’t scream R1 to me. Williams is injured and unlikely for R1 you would have thought. McHenry omitted for R2 Marsh says he isn’t best 22 for me, Collier-Dawkins I see as struggling. Rankine won’t play R1 but you would think R2-3 could be on the cards. Starting Georgiades and King seem like low scoring options to me, and Starcevich seems pretty unlikely to be in R1. Having said that, it’s a great midfield, but I have moved Pickett to the bench and gone with Serong, Rowell and Stephens/Sharp so I would see if you can do that to ensure you have some cash generation. I like the idea of having Naismith at R3, personally struggling to see how I can do it. You guys know this page only works if people actually comment on other posts rather than just posting their team and expecting feedback… agreed…. Maybe the people who post their teams need help and have no idea what they’re doing so they can’t give feedback to others because they have no idea Looking at most if the teams here that is clearly not the Case I think people need to ask questions about players there intrigued about rather then just posting a generic team that may have 4/5 players different to the majority of teams on here This is a fair point too RDT…. all thoughts and feedback welcome…… BACKS. Crisp, Docherty, Houston, Birchall, McAsey, Young. (Gould, Greaves.) MIDS. Macrae, Merrett, Neale, MItchell, Yeo, Rowell, Anderson, Serong. (Pickett, Starevich, Buderick.) RUCKS. Grundy, O’Brien. (Conroy.) FWDS. Whitfield, Dawson, Greenwood, Smith, Georgiades, King. (McAdam ,Rankine.) $47,700 left in the kitty and all Rookies are subject to change… Maybe swap Birchall to Roberton to bank some extra cash….. +1 Not sold on either but I pick Roberton over birchall Thoughts on running Patton as R2 I don’t love it, personally have always avoided the KPP types. I think with him it has a be a “if I don’t pick him what could he do” and for me I can’t see him doing enough. What would you expect from him if you run him as your r2? To score higher than his price until i suss out which is the must have ruck premo for r2. Also if some of those ruck rookie dpps play can swing fwd. Id want to see more from him tho. I really like ROB at r2, could easily see him go 105 If you want your r2 to average 60 over the first 6 rounds then go right ahead. i think it is a valid strategy if you had a r3 that plays like naismith and big darcy as fwd or utility rook that may work too i guess Only way I’d go Patton is if I was going nailsmith R2 Cam’ron R3 for more cover if nailsmith went down To me I think the issue is if he gets injured $366k is not enough to get yourself another decent ruck unless you keep a spare couple of hundred K. That said i dont mind the idea of him at F4 -F5 Please leave your thoughts DEF: Lloyd, Crisp, Docherty, Robertson, Ash, Gould (170K, 170K) MID: Macrae, Dunkley, Cripps, Adams, Tom Mitchell, Rowell, Green, Pickett (170k 2x) RUC: Pig, Jacobs FOR: Whitfield, Petracca, Brayshaw, Patton, Bonar, Mahony (170k 2x) UTILITY:170K What do you guys think? Mahony doesn’t play Green more likely to not play than play, maybe trade to Anderson? All popular picks, which means you’ll probably be around the pack but not ahead of it. FWD line comes across too risky for mine, needs one f4/5/6 up to one of the 600k types at least. Your midfield could win your games on their own if they all go at the same time Fwd lines weak Cheers guys for the feedback Used: $12,911,000 (99.3%), Remaining: $89,000 (0.7%) On Ground: $11,308,000 (87%), On Bench: $1,603,000 (12.3%) Def: D.Houston (80.35), S.Docherty (75.90), A.Cerra (60.80), D.Roberton (44.08), L.Ash (35.59), W.Gould (29.66) (J.Brander (29.25), D.Greaves (22.92)) Mid: J.Macrae (115.66), Z.Merrett (108.25), S.Coniglio (103.67), T.Mitchell (90.46), A.Brayshaw (69.56), M.Rowell (36.40), N.Anderson (36.13), C.Serong (34.51) (T.Green (33.97), M.Pickett (22.92), N.McHenry (22.92)) Ruc: B.Grundy (122.14), R.O’Brien (95.58) (S.Naismith (38.29)) Fwd: L.Whitfield (113.78), C.Wingard (78.46), H.Greenwood (78.32), J.Patton (49.34), C.Jones (42.87), C.Budarick (22.92) (I.Rankine (22.92), M.King (22.92)) Patton will go not sure for who brander probably as well thoughts? Downgrade brander for some cash and then upgrade Patton? not too sure who too either…. Snelling if you believe in marsh hype brander probably won’t play, id downgrade him for some $. Wouldn’t recommend starting budarick on your field, spend some of that extra cash to upgrade one of your fwd rooks to maybe poholke or bonar. don’t sweat on Green being named. Fwd line weak Im confused by the utility position. Can a utility be an emergency? yep Yep, but only for the nominated line if dpp, not both. Would love some constructive criticism of my team. DEF: D. Houston, H. Clark, W. Milera, S. Docherty, D. Roberton, L. Ash (W. Gould, H. Goddard) MID: J. Macrae, J. Dunkley, L. Neale, T. Mitchell, M. Rowell, N. Anderson, C. Serong, M. Pickett (B. Starcevich, C. Budarick) RUC: B. Grundy, R. O’Brien, (D. Cameron) FWD: C. Wingard, H. Greenwood, C. Petracca, A. Brayshaw, C. Jones, J. Townsend (M. King, I. Rankine) $54K left (T. Xerri) Strong in all lines except midfield, a few too many rooks there for my liking. Use that 54k to get Townsend up to Sparrow/Poholke/Bonar I have the same midfield except I currently have Coniglio over Neale, interested to hear your thoughts there. I like the structure, hence why I have it (due to the limited and poor rookies in the DEF/FWD) I would also look at the possibility of getting Wingard up to Whitfield. Hawks have a deep midfield Titch, JOM, Worpel, Shiels, Howe so you’d imagine Wingard will also get stints in there. This could be generated via cheaper d2/3 Cerra/Doedee or even selecting a 2nd rookie (Gould on field). Solid. Just posing some alternatives. I think Coniglio and Neale are 50/50 picks, it’s hard choosing between the two. Wingard to Whitfield would be nice. Thanks for your feedback SouvLarkey. no worries, you can see my team below Thanks Campbell. like it a lot. not too vanilla, not too unique, just the right amount of PODs. almost cannot fault it, apart from maybe petracca? don’t expect big scores every week, he’s always been a fringe player and i can’t see much changing (maybe i’m just being pessimistic). great stuff though mate !! I’m looking forward to watching Petracca again this weekend, I thought he was a beast against Adelaide. I was a sucker for him last year as well. Thanks man. Downgrade Townsend upgrade jones don’t like either of them or upgrade a mid. Get rid of gould get in grieves same points I reckon and 50k to spend on upgrade I’ll have a play around with those rookies lc3. there’s not going to be 3 170k defender options. Greaves has to be a bench player for mine I think the 4 premo mids is the way to go. not many rooks down back an duds rooks up forward this year. Like the milera, Clark picks. Don’t like Townsend great tackler but only finds the ball at training I like that backline a lot. For what it’s worth, I would try run one more premium in the middle – personally I am not that sold on Anderson’s scoring but I imagine I will be proven wrong. I quite like Hopper at M5 at the moment, with the idea that one of the premiums who runs into DeBoer in the first month will be able to be swooped on pretty easily. Goddard and Starcevich I don’t think play R1, I’m personally sweating on Budarick. I like Xerri and am going to make him my utility as well. I just got rid of Jones for Patton. I would think about Sharp/Stephens as your last on field mid maybe DEF: Houston, Docherty, Cerra, Roberton, Gould, Brander (Greaves, 170K) MID: Macrae, Dunkley, Coniglio, Titchell, Rowell, Anderson, Serong, Pickett (Budarick, 170K) RUC: Grundy, O’Brien (Naismith) FWD: Whitfield, Dawson, Greenwood, Petracca, Brayshaw, Bonar (Rankine, King) UTL: (Sturt) If Darcy Cameron is named round 1 I get him in by benching Brander, flipping Dawson to DEF and playing him at f6. Feel pretty confident with this side, subject to the rookies get named. What are your thoughts? This team makes me real nervous for your season first thing if Cameron plays start him R3 you haven’t seen his role next to Grundy, Budarick needs to be on your field in the forwards, Bonar is more of a SuperCoach impact player I’ve got sparrow if he plays it’ll be in the midfield, Your midfield is also real light your going to spend so much money trying to upgrade the likes of Anderson and Serong you need another 600k plus mid to start the season. Dawson is so risky since you haven’t seen him next to Lloyd and mills dpp doesn’t mean shit if he doesn’t sure 95 plus. Also Ash over brander if there named, T Brown is an option for your mid bench. Start by dropping Naismith and bonar to Cameron and budarick and see how much cash that gets you to upgrade a mid rookie Sparrow was omitted from Marsh 2. Ash still has Williams and Corr to come into the DEF who aren’t listed in Marsh 2. Midfield rookies are the best across all lines, yet midfield midpricers are the worst across all lines. I’d rather go an extra rookie in the midfield and grab 2 midpricers for the price of a mid premium. Dawson may be a punt, but the upside is there, he is a midpricer so there’s always going to be ?’s. That’s my justification, obviously a difference of opinion. Def: Crisp/Daniel/Dawson Houston Docherty Birchall/Ash Roberton Gould/young (brander Greaves) Mid: Dunkley bont Coniglio/Merrett Mitchell Selwood/McGrath Rowell Anderson Picket (buderick McHenry) Ruck: Grundy Jacobs/nicnac/Phillips (Cameron) For: Whitfield Wingard Greenwood Patton/Brayshaw/parish Poholke/C Jones Townsend (king Rankine) Ute (xerri) Rookies can be changed. Happy for advice on the slashes i would say Crisp, Ash, Gould, Cogs, McGrath, Jacobs, Brayshaw, Jones, Poholke. (if that works) best ute ever, great foresight Whats everyone’s genuine thoughts about Naismith a R2? high risk, high reward…. but if he gets injured you will have no where to go unless you have already banked about $400,000 Not if you have a r/f backup in your forward line like Patton or Ceglar. Just swing them to r2 and get a cheap forward. He can average 75 imo with Sinclair in the same side, Sydney have stated they see him being the number 1 ruck in the side with Sinclair being the more natural forward who will pinch hit in the ruck. However if he gets dropped or injured early your gunna have to downgrade a premo to get Naismith to a decent ruck and could derail your whole season. Look through his injury history before you make your decision. I was locked in for G+G in the ruck but Naismith as swans preferred ruck at that price…. I can’t pass that up, all that extra $$$ can really go a long way on other lines and if it came too it you should be able to trade out of trouble, just need to drop one of your extra premos down to a rook and should be able to get pretty much any ruck. Any idea when player profiles will be updated? Half my team have no faces! Good Luck in 2020 Can we also please turn off the “Utility message” i think i got it! Good Luck in 2020 Now that I know it annoys you, I’ll keep it there for longer. Like it Cheeky ? That is the nicest thing you have ever said to me! Good Luck in 2020 Defence: Houston Milera Docherty Roberton Gould starcevich Mid: dunks Adams titch brayshaw Selwood Hately Rowell sharp Ruck: Grundy ROB Forward: Whitfield greenwood wingard brayshaw bewley gregoriades Bench all 170k Utility: rivers 10k remaining Feedback would be appreciated please? Don’t like the selwood pick. not sold on the freo boys maybe selwood down Anderson, sorong Brayshaw up to Oliver, crips type an u might have a bit left over to upgrade bewley to rozee also like Lynch (rich) about the same price I think. like milera, Adams an ROB picks overall Like the Hately and Adams picks. Risky with brayshaw, will either pay dividends or burn you big time. Would be worried if starcevich isn’t named, slim pickings for def and fwd rookies pay to downgrade some like bewley or selwood and beef up the rookies… Hey people, just having a bit of a struggle on a very subjective pick and thought that I might not be the only one. Thought it would be interesting and potentially helpful to see what you guys think and could potentially be a reference point for others who are stuck. I’m looking at the underpriced premium mid position with the likes of Neale, Cogs, Oliver, Bont… What r ur guys thoughts? Doesn’t have to be one of those 4 players, just a mid premium who’s gonna raise there game to the next level or is potentially a little underpriced. Thanks in advance for anyone who helps out. Adams an gogs way under priced Oliver an crips are both good value imo but the tags always hurt them during the year We know what coniglio does he’ll be 115 the first half but may tail off but he’s a shot for DPP, Neale suffers from a tag more a SuperCoach dude. Oliver and Bont both attract the tag but it affects them less both great picks I’m targeting The bont after his bye and I’m not starting Oliver but he’s the first guy I’ll bring in if one of my premise go down with injury. Jacob Hopper could be one for you he’s different to a lot of the GWS mids because he can only play inside mid it’s his whole game, my hope for him is to smash a 115 average to his bye and I’ll trade him to someone coming off there bye as I’ll also have macrae, Dunkley and coniglio. I like jack Viney at 611k he’s as healthy as he’s ever been Melbourne should be on the rise the tags going to Oliver all day I just want to see that Midfield mix in Marsh 2 with Oliver, Brayshaw and Petracca Thanks SB and Browny, both really helpful! I have also been considering Hopper but at the moment I have McCluggage instead for a unique pick and the hope that he can raise his game to the next level! I keep switching back and forth between the two. Also, thanks for the heads up on Neale, I have mainly done SuperCoach in the past so have been used to him being one of the most expensive and best players. Thanks a lot both of you for the help! any thoughts on these options, just havin a little trouble with the back line D1, houston, docherty, D4, ash, gould (Bianco, Ling) couple of options are: Weller, Roberton Dawson, Roberton Crisp, Rivers all opinions are appreciated! roberton too cheap to ignore.can you go crows smith? not sure on the price difference between dawson and him but he looks likely to play in a fantasy friendly spot Crisp if Rivers is named but don’t think he will if not Dawson an Roberton but think Dawson’s role will change week 2 week like sicdog last year yeah I’ve heard that too about Dawson, and with Rivers it will be interesting how he plays if he is picked for the marsh series. definitely looking for a bigger premium defender than Weller or Dawson, Crisp looking in for a big year. cheers Hey Lads, Rate the from best to worst: McCluggage, Walsh, Hopper, Ross, Adams Are there any bombers fans on here that can give me their thoughts on Parish?? Has averaged 70’s for 4 years now but i reckon he’s capable of averaging 90-95 this year. Scored 104 from just 65% game time. Will he get enough mid time?? Hey John Ahern, I am also a strong believer in Parish, and McGrath as well at the moment! He is definitely worth picking in my eyes, he’s been training with the midfield group and I agree that he can definitely get to 90 – 95! If not that than I reckon at least 85. So, in other words, yes he’ll get enough mid time to be worth picking. Hope this Helped! Is Acres out or what? Cant find anything just he was sent for scans on Thursday, and a comment in the forwards article he is out but cant confirm anywhere else word is he’ll miss the first few rounds of the season. think there is an article on the afl website. Option 1: Lycett and danger or Option 2: ROB and kelly ROB and Kelly easy Hi everyone DEF Daniel,Houston, Docherty, J Kelly, Ash, Rivers (Goddard, Starcevich) MID Macrae, Dunkley, Walters, Mitchall, E Curnow Rowell, Serong,Pickett (Bytel, McHenry) RUC R Obrien, Jacobs (Xerri ) FOR Whitfield, Lambert, Ebert, Greenwood,Townsend, Georgiades (Rankine, king) Utility(Cameron) 00$ left A few abit iffy any thoughts? much appreciate any input Thanks and good luck Walters M4… Its a No from me… You start Whitfield but not Grundy.. Remember 2 Grundy’s are better then 2 Whitfield’s. Good Luck™®© Thanks TCW any suggestions instead of walters and whitfield I think you need to start both Whitfield and Grundy… Look at bringing in value players, Tim Kelly, Jacob Hopper, Darcy Macpherson, Sam Walsh. Good Luck™®© Cheers i had Hopper and Macpherson in first draft and already added Grundy thanks again TCW Houston, doc, cerra, Roberton, gould, brander(ling, mclennon) Mcrae, dunkley, Adams, Ross, Mitchell, cotchin, Rowell, picket(bytel, mchendry) Grundy, naismith(Cameron) Whitfield, parish, wingard, brayshaw, simpkin, jones(rankine, cahill) (xerri) Any thoughts? Better then half to sober coach’s around here. Keep up the good work. Good Luck™®© Thx Can ya have a look at my team fellas? DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doch, Laird, Robertson, Gould (Bianco and Prior) MID: Dunkley, Bont, T Mitchell, Coniglio, Green, Rowell, Deven Robertson, Pickett (Jones and McHenry) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs (Cameron) FWD: Whitfield, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Petracca, Bonar, Rankine (Max King and Cavarra) UTILITY: Bytel Got 90K left Cheers Not sold on Petracca i have the feeling he will be the Gus Brayshaw of 2020. 4 rookies in the Midfield will be hard to overcome if history is anything to go by, Past 3 winners have all started round 1 with only 2 rookies starting in the Midfield.. Good Luck™®© How many past winners have started with 7 rookies in defence? It was 6 thankyou! :) Good Luck™®© Have to agree with what The Chosen Won said, 4 rookies is definitely too many. I can see why The Chosen Won said no to Petracca, he has burnt us in the past, but if he performs well in marsh 2 then it’s really up to you. I would also say no to Laird. Maybe try downgrading him to a rookie and using the cash to get another mid. Hope this Helped! Some players are over hyped and Petracca is one IMO, 85 games and he’s past 100 Fantasy point on just 5 occasion he just doesn’t fit the Fantasy mould. Even if he “Quadrupedal” his output hes still not relevant. Good Luck™®© Heya guys would love some feedback on this please Back: Docherty, roberton, Cerra, houston, Milera, Gould ( Thompson, McLennan ) Midfield: Macrae, Bontempelli, Mitchell, Lyons, Tim kelly, Rowell, green, Pickett ( McHenry, Starcevich ) Ruck; Grundy, sauce ( xerri) Forward: Whitfield, wingard, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Townsend, king ( Cameron, rankine ) Thoughts guys?? Thanks heaps Thoughts on this for a different structure, and going heavy in the MIDS? DEF: Houston, Docherty, Cerra, Roberton, Ash, Gould (Greaves, Watson) MID: Macrae, Dunkley, Oliver, Bontempelli, Coniglio, Mitchell, Rowell, Anderson (Pickett, Budarick) RUC: Grundy, Jacobs (Sweet) FWD: Wingard, Greenwood, Brayshaw, Patton, Poholke, Georgiades (King, Sturt) UTL: McInerney Cheers! G’day fellas, any chance of ordering these from best to worst Macpherson Brayshaw Wingard Greenwood Petracca JJK Ebert Completely stumped on who my F2,F3 and F4 should be… cheers Macpherson Wingard Brayshaw Petracca Greenwood JJK Ebert i get why people talk up Greenwood with his tackling and playing for a team where he may get more time in midfield and all that i just don’t think he will improve as much as what people are hoping but will stand corrected Brayshaw Greenwood Wingard Macpherson Petracca JJK Ebert Agreed except switch Greenwood and Brayshaw around Imo Wingard Macpherson Brayshaw Petracca Greenwood Ebert JJK DEF: Crisp, Houston, Doch, Sicily, Robertson, Gould (Starcavitch and Mclennan) MID: Cripps, Anderson, T Mitchell, Whitfield, Green, Rowell, Greenwood Neale (pickett and McHenry) RUCK: ROB, Jacobs (Cameron) FWD: Martin, Snelling, Brayshaw, Wingard, Patton, Rankine (Xerri and McAdam) UTILITY: Budarich Got 156K left to massage DEF: B. Smith, Houston, Doch, Roberton, Gould, Brander (Kennerly, Mclennan) MID: Macrae, Neale, Mitchell, Kelly, Walsh, Rowell, Pickett, Sharp (Brown, Smith) RUCK: Grundy, Jacobs (Xerri) Forward: Whitfield, D. Martin, Walters, J. Martin, Georgiades, Rankine (King, Davis) Utility: Cameron Rankine won’t play R1, Martin and Georgiades seem risky picks to me. Really good midfield and backline but don’t think many of your bench rookies are going to play. I like Sharp personally but I would also consider Serong, see if you can get Pickett onto your bench Def: Crisp, Houston, Doc, Roberton, Gould, Brander (I know) (Butts, Greaves (neither of whom look R1 likely) Mid: Dunk, Titch, Adams, Yeo, Hopper, Rowell, Serong, Stephens (Pickett, McInerney) Ruck: Grundy, Sauce (Cameron) Fwd: Whitfield, Wingard, Brayshaw, Greenwood, Patton, Townsend (King, Sturt) Ut: Xerri Thinking maybe Pickett on field and try get Stephens or Sharp onto the bench. Maybe Sturt -> Budarick. Any defensive rookies going to be playing R1? Sauce and Tracca vs Gawn and Georgiades Defence: Laird Docherty Dawson Roberton Gould Brander (BWilliams Young) Midfield: Fyfe Neale Dunkley Prestia Rowell Pickett Robertson Stephens (Bytel Starcevich) Ruck: Grundy Gawn (Cameron) Forward: Whitfield Macpherson Smith Brayshaw Sturt Budarick (Rankine King) Utility: Xerri $25K remaining Try pick players with a bit of upside – not sure that’s Fyfe, and you probably need 1 more elite mid to start with. I really don’t think starting Sturt and Budarick is going to be a good idea, but I love Macpherson. Also, most of your bench isn’t likely to play R1 (Bytel, Starc, B. Williams, Young, Rankine) Thoughts on this lads…? Def: J.Crisp, D.Houston, S.Docherty, D.Roberton, H.Young, W.Gould (H.Goddard, J.McLennan) Mid: J.Dunkley, Z.Merrett, C.Oliver, T.Mitchell, M.Rowell, N.Anderson, C.Serong, J.Sharp (M.Hibberd ,B.Starcevich, M.Pickett) Ruc: B.Grundy, S.Naismith (D.Cameron) Fwd: L.Whitfield, D.Martin, D.Smith, H.Greenwood, A.Brayshaw, M.Georgiades (M.King, I.Rankine) Anyone rate Ceglar as a possible R2? He has potential, but id say sauce is a better option, as he is cheaper, and historically scores better. Join my AFL Fantasy league – ECHZUV4A Anyone considering Hibberd after last nights performance?
